um. www.cmu.edu proves that we were the *original* CMU. take THAT
This was a conversation my buddy had at an apartment he just moved into. There was a party going on, hosted by one of his house mates. The other person in this conversation was a HUGE bitch, who thought she was gods gift to the earth (even though she was overweight and butt ass ugly).  my friend: *reaches for a beer from the mini fridge in HIS room*. girl: "Um excuse me. What are you doing here? Do I even know you?" my friend: "I'm getting a beer from my fridge, and no - I don't talk to fat girls."
&gt;Nebraska &gt;Diocese of Grand Island (no priests listed in the database)  This is hilarious because I know of two priests, one in the 80s and one in the 90s that were moved elsewhere because of what they did.  The Diocese of Grand Island (iirc) also covers Scottsbluff.  I have a friend here who was molested by a priest.  He molested several kids in the 80s and was moved to California.  He was moved back to Scottsbluff two years ago.  Everyone knows about him, yet no one speaks about it.
You must be one of   &gt; those folks that are THAT into beer that they can’t hold conversations about brews with anyone besides another elite member of their cult   or something...  :)
Nah, she isn't anywhere close to quitting on me.  It's one of those situations where she will throw fits about wanting to leave, for hours or days, and when I finally say 'k, there's the door' she pulls back and starts with the 'that's not what I really want.'  Anyway this isn't really a productive topic so ... 
NCSU  NC STATE
You make bacon?
It was a joke :-)
A bit extreme, but it's a step in the right direction!
Say no to trolls!!
TF2 is a lag fest. Every update reduces fps. Some people claim its lazy programming, but hell if I know. All I know is that tf2 has bad fps on my comp compared to other steam games.  I'm sorry I won't be able to help this guy besides the typical 'update your drivers' or 'reinstall'. Er, maybe try defragging your hard drive?
Where in CT? I have family in Shelton (and surrounding towns).
So? whats the problem how many other countries don't do the same thing?  Look at the USA and CANADA in the softwood lumber. How many times was the USA ruled against and they don't care about no stinking trade pacts.
Prudence?   What do you possibly have to lose from people not knowing what Alberta is?  Besides, this is reddit.  Most people on here are considerably more informed than the average American
"You will occasionally get a very mild sensation that feels like you are a bit hungry" ...the first time i tried to quit i was laid out in my bed for two days shaking and out of my fucking head... it's gotten better now that i've cut back a good bit but I still go bat shit crazy and get angry at the sky and have trouble talking straight for days when i try to quit. Sometimes they taste like strawberries or honey :/  Just view it as weeds that need trimming and keep slashing away at it with all you have. eventually you will win 
&gt; If evil is subjective  I'm good with that. Tell the faithful who wave their holy books at me, assuring me that since they have *the* god, that god's will is to be enforced on everyone.
I thought the Vader costume was a burka.
http://www.reddit.com/r/Atheist_symbol_poll/
If that would have been around Michigan State University, it could be a more specific "Spartan S."
If they get caught, I'd turn em in, but more as a punishment for getting caught...not actually for the action.
I use Linux because it's easier than Windows, cheaper than Mac, and more popular than the rest.
I don't particularly care about /r/islam. I care about the prevalent delusion that Islam is just another religion, and that all religions are basically the same.  &gt;you can just as easily find a peaceful Muslim that does not wish ill to anybody  Then that person is by definition not a Muslim, in any meaningful religious sense of the word. Just as a Christian who denies Jesus as our savior is not a Christian, by definition.  Sure, there are some "Muslims" who participate in certain rites associated with Islam without believing in it, just like there are "Christians" who celebrate Christmas and go to Church for funerals and weddings. Those are not the ones that concern me.  Oh and I do know some Muslims who live close to me - that's what alerted me to the barbarism of Islam in the first place. There's nothing like hearing someone in real life defend slavery, and sex-slavery, in the 21st century, to open your eyes. (You see there is a work-around to the limit of four wives: you can own an unlimited number of slaves and it is permitted to have sex with them, just like Muhammad did). And these were educated people belonging to mainstream Muslim organizations.
Useful stuff in a lot of places: http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Cow_dung  Actually when it's dry, it just looks like mud and grass, does not smell bad at all (I had no problem holding it in my hand) - it's really the industrial sludge that most cows are fed that makes it stink like hell.
I would like to add that I regret resorting to name calling. You are right that it was childish of me. Shall we call a truce, at least on the "zealot" and "tyrant" accusations?
What's the difference between the Catholic Church and acne?  Acne waits until your 14 till it cums all over your face...  I'll be here all week.
&gt;You are making assumptions about her based on information she failed to provide that you consider to be necessary. She made the choices about what to put in her letter.  She made the decision that the only information I would receive about her choice was that she "prefers to date white men."  If there were other reasons, she therefore deliberately left those reasons out.   That was how she presented herself, and it is on her presentation that I judge her.
Considering that home prices were about 100% overvalued before the crash, no, 33% is not enough.
Well, in this case, it started as a chat client. I'm going to springboard this small platform into a description of doing STUN style NAT traversal. You need UDP for that.
It would be excellent if she received more Pro-Penn &amp; Teller than anti-Penn &amp; Teller letters.
hmm... a good question. i would guess that just posting something with 'theme' in the title might be a good place to start.   and yeah... love the wet t-shirt. your pic in the reddit t-shirt was the tops.
So many people in sales and marketing try to say this kind of thing and come off as if they're not acknowledging that other people are thinking beings.  To say that they think but that that thinking can be disconnected from the decision making is a very perceptive distinction.
Why is it cool to hate Nickelback again?
If you can't argue against him then don't bother to reply. What that guy says is the true and what your saying is retarded.
Camera phone? You know what really grinds my gears? The main function is the phone element and the camera is secondary. It is your phone's camera, not your camera phone. Camera... that's a weird word.  Where are my Cheetos?
The point is that you can't help being attracted to a given physical trait over another one. Short blond girls drive me crazy, tall brunettes, not so much. White girls catch my eyes more than black girls. It's not racism, it's just attraction. 
&gt;Still not proof.  Then please define what you mean by proof.
a chuck roast is usually a good choice and not that expensive.  find one with a bone in it, and submerge the bottom 1 1/2 to 2 inches in equal parts red wine and beef broth.  throw in a yellow onion, a carrot, yukon gold potatoes, a turnip, a beet, a sprig of rosemary, and two cloves of garlic...dinner's done in four hours, homie!
Beginning of punny thread.
1) AWESOME screen name. Is it OK if I call you fd1 for short? :)  2) Yeah, its a $200 tax stamp and registration via a Title II Form 4, or a form 1 if you manufacture it yourself. I can appreciate your POV regarding registration. In some places, like california, Title II is the only way that you can (legally) get a black gun.   Out of curiosity, what loads do you use against these dogs?
A large majority of Americans are gullible fools. That's the real problem.
&gt; "Because it makes us feel good" is basically the answer I'm getting from that. I don't share the faith, but I definitely like feeling good so I guess I can relate.  I like feeling good too, so i can relate to that as well. But just because I *want* a pony that craps gold nuggets, that doesn't make it a reality.
Haha I was thinking of Biff, and the genie guessed Chunk from *The Goonies*.  Wrong, but kinda hilarious.
Assault on Precinct 13?
One of the best strategy games of all time. Each hero has their own unique playstyle and each town has different strategies. Also if you haven't done so, really check out the Wake of the Gods unofficial addon. It adds soo much and some balance changes.
Wow, grandpa found the fountain of youth!
Horrible compared to what? As if my other submissions are worthwhile? Bah.
Learn to embrace inversion of control  Experience TDD
**[This comment was not censored by the reddit admins]**
Critical Mass has nothing to do with cycling at this point. It is merely a get together of people who want to run red lights with impunity and be D-bags to society in general. Not only do they ride on sidewalks, they actually ride into shopping malls here in San Diego. The ride down escalators and through the pedestrian lanes (not meant for cars nor bikes - just people). "Share the road" to CM = cyclists only. That does not = "share". When you block off streets to traffic you are not sharing.  www.CriticalMassSucks.com
Super Metroid was the one for SNES, right? Yeah, if so, I never actually tried that one. I wish I liked them! I see everyone getting really excited about them all the time and am honestly a bit jealous I don't feel the smae way. Don't they feel generic and wonky in the controls to you?
What's relly going to suck is if inflation destroys the savings of people like this. I personally know 4 in a similar scenario and all of them are planning on buying very soon.
why play multiple choice? i would definitively say "i'm not into asian girls"
You're awesome. I love you. &lt;3
I am not trying to be funny...this is the honest to goodness truth.  I recently started logging into reddit while I read so I can down-vote self.AskReddit submissions on the front page.  At first, it was an amusing break from "video of police tasering someone"...and some of the questions/comments are really good.  But after seeing one too many "I can't spell today, anybody else like that?"...I just fucking had enough...Why doesn't reddit let us filter what we see?  I don't want to see any more askreddit submissions....and the next to follow is....it is my dad/sister/uncle's birthday today and they read reddit.....ughghhhhhhh....(again, cute at first...but enough already)
Fuck, that's right.
I keep playing and I NEVER get anything out... Should I just tilt?
You are right, it is a pretty shitty pic... BEACUSE THE LINK DOESNT FKN WORK!!!!!!!!
It may have been.  "Apostrophe in the head" sounds pretty violent to me.
Yes - perhaps that was no mistake in this instance.
I own both "Fat of the Land" and "Ill Communication." "Funky Shit" by Prodigy is one of my favorite pump-up, work out songs (actually, the whole cd, really). I simply went with the original recording.
There is no proper way to do file uploads using AJAX, it's all iframe trickery.
I dint even notice the name of the user until I read the next comment
A rapist, an arsonist, a murder, a necrophiliac and a masochist are all in a psychiatric hospital sitting around a lunch table.  The rapist points to a cat just outside the fence and he says to the others "Man, I could really rape, that cat.. I'd rape it good!".  The arsonist looks at the cat and says "Yeah, then I'd set it on fire and watch it burn".  Then the murder takes a look and says "when you're done burning it, I'm gonna kill the thing-- just choke it or beat it to death or something".  The necrophiliac says "and after its dead I'm gonna fuck it again".  Then there is a real long pause and everyone turns to look at the masochist because he's not joining in and the masochist says "Meow".
Mindlessly typing on reddit is one thing.  Recollecting stories is another.
i didn't even bother reading the link because we all know what their goals and tactics are. goal: to make the obama administration and democrats look like failures by... tactics: lying through their teeth and getting their idiot base to believe everything they say as fact.  of course the dems don't help by not having backbones...
Throwing this out here again, if anybody *still* hasn't played this I have a gift copy on Steam that's sad and lonely.
user for two hours :-(
And too scared to face the angry pro-healthcare reform majority who are pissed off at them for lying and grandstanding with the drooling right-wing mob they created. 
There a few good one liners in there but for sheer devastation? - when Jon Stewart appeared on CNN's Crossfire. They invited Stewart on after he'd been slagging them for weeks so they could joust.  Stewart took them down.  He was so devastating that Crossfire was canceled not long afterward.   http://video.google.com/videosearch?q=Jon+Stewart+crossfire&amp;hl=en&amp;emb=0&amp;aq=f#
You're talking about water.
Cute kitty.  My cat hates Reddit, it distracts me too much and cuts into his petting time.
Yes, and for two reasons, if not more:   a) Extreme fashion for men is JUST as complex as women - the upper end of it is competitive and both sexes must work very hard to perform.  b) Homosexuality is a very natural thing. It's been happening in humans for *all* of recorded history. It has been observed in dogs, cats and other mammals. It's natural for a 'homosexual' view of beauty to come through in even straight men and women. We're nowhere near as simple as we like to think we are.  As for your "the male form is more aesthetically pleasing", I disagree as I believe we are programmed by our genetics to appreciate curves. In nature, in mathematics, in bodily form, in lingusitic expression. BUT the ideal male form is more detailed - simply put, sculpting an ideal male form that is aesthetically pleasing is more difficult.  Also, "aesthetically pleasing" is a complicated thing in itself. The male aesthetic ideal is (generally) considered to be in the peak of athletic condition striking a pose that demonstrates his perfection as a fluid machine, wound like a spring but perfectly controlled. It's difficult to encapsulate all this. Of course, it's pretty difficult to capture the feminine ideal as well.
Ooh, then maybe there are other problems going on. I regularly transfer data from a server in Seattle and finally gave up on ssh/ftp in favor of tarballs over http since I can fill the line over http and not ssh/ftp. I guess I always assumed the problem was Comcast's because I have no issues with ssh/ftp at other locations O_o
This one's definitely getting good reviews.
And there's no good reason to believe that love exists.  Either things can be proven in a test tube or there is "no good reason" to believe they are so.  Good thinking.
eeepc's are fucking amazing, i have a 2g surf (literally the worst one ever made as far as specs), i've had it running 24/7 for over 6 months and it's yet to have any kind of problem. my only complaints are battery life and that it struggles with higher-res video playback, but i'll upgrade soon enough. the new ones are so much better it basically gives me a boner
Yes, but I've got mild [acrophobia](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Acrophobia), so I've always blamed it on that. 
I was. I had hoped it would more strongly condemn the Church. They spent way too much time on the Italian Comedian. 
I don't know what a 401K is, but if it's like our (UK) national insurance, take it out of your calculations.  State run investments can't solely be relied upon.  Spread your bets.
I don't even think it was a boner.
I haven't seen or tried Seven, or read much about it since the first RCs came out and people startd buzzing about it, but it seems there might be hope there, XP emulated etc. But a lot of it could be marketing...
yes! me too. It was actually funny when it was the insanity test.
Lieberman already had the exposure and popularity as a Democrat.
I'm not gonna find an automatic weapon down the street. I need to find myself something semi-auto, and if that's the case, I'm not going to make it a semi-auto assault rifle. Ain't nothing can be done with one of those that I can't do with something akin to an M14. I've uh....completely checked out. I had more to say, but I've kind of since stopped caring. Anyway, thanks for not making this a shouting match and stuff.
Uh, why is this not a valid reason to fire someone?  In the US, they can fire you for farting in the elevator if they want.
You'll most likely be told that it is nothing to worry about, but keep an eye on it and if it stops growing hair, see a specialist immediately.
The 2nd guy needs to grip the bar wider if he wants to hit his lats
Good. We need to use all available resources to hunt down and kill the people responsible for 9/11. Do you *really* believe that only a few fringe Arabs were responsible for it?  Every single one of those funny-looking goat-fuckers are responsible for 9/11.
It's racist if you don't get out there and fuck a greasy nigger **RIGHT NOW**
That depends on the [flies](http://ohioline.osu.edu/hyg-fact/2000/2109.html)
That is actually my retirement plan, except my hot tub will be in the middle of Orlando so I don't feel bad if I shoot anything. 
That is not only kind, I'll bet it's also accurate in this scenario.
"To those concerned with grammer".  Jesus wept. Just wait til the spelling fascists hear about this.
Catholic atheist here.
Thank you for your blessings, I may now upvote in absolute peace, knowing ephemeron0 approves of my 'good time.'
I agree. While I certainly applaud anyone wanting to do a hundred pushups, take it from this old gym rat, I've spent my entire adult life in the gym, and a program like this one can do more harm than good.  If you only train one part of your body (and that's all a single exercise like pushups is going to do for you), you're setting yourself up for injuries down the road. I've seen it a hundred times.  It's like putting a powerful engine in a stock Toyota Tercel. What will you accomplish? You'll blow out the drive train, the clutch, the transmission, etc., because those factory parts aren't designed to handle the power of an engine much more powerful than the factory installed engine.  Pushups basically only train the chest muscles and to some extent, the triceps. What you really want to do is train your entire body, all the major muscle groups (chest, back, abdomen, legs, shoulders and arms) at the same time, over the course of a workout. And don't forget your cardiovascular work!  I'm proud of you guys wanting to do this. Three cheers! Falling in love with exercise, eating right, etc., is one of the greatest things you can do for yourself. And you WILL fall in love with it if you can just force yourself to stick with it a year or two and experience the amazing progress you'll make.  But do it right, okay?  My advice, find a good gym, with qualified trainers who will design your programs for you (especially in the beginning, until you get the hang of it yourself) and guide you in your quest for physical fitness. Thirty to 45 minutes a day, three days a week, is all you'll ever need to do (I refuse to believe anyone is so busy that he or she cannot make time for that, especially considering how important it is).  And don't worry about being embarrassed or not being in shape the first time you walk into the gym. You have to start somewhere and almost every one of us were there ourselves at one time. So no one will say anything to you and very, very quickly you will progress way beyond that stage anyway.  Now get out there and do it! :-)
Would be nice if "who you are" was not a completely arbitrary concept.
Dentistry and Orthodontistry are separate professions the the braces/cavity inversion didn't benefit any particular people, probably just an effect of better marketing by one side of the industry.
I didn't insist anything. I said there's a quote system. Besides, I'd rather make demands than invoke Godwin's law like it's a smart idea.
Maybe that's why I love cold weather so much. 
I do admit I have kind of compressed the hell out of them to get the levels even through all the songs.  A little more dynamics would be nice, I agree...
That was a depressing article. Lindros can go fuck himself. 
It's about goddamn time. 
sounds like science porn. i like it.
Does anyone know a site where company parents of other companies can be easily viewed? I've often wondered who owns [X] and find it always takes too long to find out.
Ethical reasoning, indeed.
I'm having a really hard time with the phonetic ...if your "brass" were "embrasse" it would mean 'kiss' -and if "batan" were "putain" it would mean 'bitch'.  Again, the phonetics are throwing me a bit...  I could see how both words could be heard phonetically as you described. *edit: inserted a missing 'the'.
To be honest, I think attraction is almost entirely a cultural thing. We are all the product of our environment. Mind you my evidence is entirely anecdotal... but it's been a bit of a curious point for me in recent years as I've noticed that... well, everyone really has wildly different ideas of who is attractive/who is not, etc. So I've discussed with a number of people I know, and the one thing that seems pretty common among everyone I've spoken with is this: We tend to find the sorts of people we grew up around attractive. To wit, I'm Caucasian but grew up in a city with a heavy mix of various Asian cultures, as well as a large Mexican community. There are many, many other communities there mind you, but most everyone from the area (especially the part of town I grew up in) will tell you that as the ethnic breakdown goes, Mexicans and Vietnamese dominate. As most of the girls I grew up alongside/went to school with were generally either of the two afore-mentioned elasticities, I tend to be most attracted to Mexican girls and Southeast Asian girls. White girls rarely do anything for me.  By contrast another friend of mine grew up down here in LA, in a community that was predominantly Black, though around high-school his family moved to an extremely White city. He's most attracted to Black girls and White girls.  But in both our cases it's not a hard-and-fast rule either. I suspect eventually you'll find the same is true for you! :)
I've invented a device that makes you read everything in your head in my voice!
I like latina women.
He's a billionaire. How a billionaire got to be head of a leftist party I don't know. But Jesus already said the rich would go to hell. So unless he's not a Christian, he must be deluding himself. 
**Chef, have you ever had something happen to you, but nobody believed you?**
Yeah, college parties are really overrated, compared to how they make it seem in movies and such. You should go to a couple though just to get the experience. If nothing else, you can make fun of other people acting the fool.
"it is a map that is aware that it is a map." Holy crap, the maps have become self-aware!
I used to work at a repair shop that did backups, and they found a lot of child porn on someone's computer during a backup.  They asked their attorney: he said that the child porn was technically in their possession during that time, and to neglect to turn it over to the FBI could have some consequences.
now that is more like it
CLONE ENTIRE PROJECT PERL-&gt;BASH http://www.floodgap.com/software/ttytter/
Doesn't bother me too much, I blame the pope and the other people in silly hats for far more global issues than melting icecaps. Of course, the blame I place on them is founded on factual data and historical observations, not an oddly hypocritical "feeling" whispered in my ear by an invisible friend.
Oh my. How *awful*!
I've upgraded the hardware in this box three times since I bought it... reformatted at least 8 times with multiple different operating systems on multiple architectures, and never had a problem. Hell, even when I was dual-booting XP x86 and Win7 x64, it just needed to re-authenticate every time. Same exact installation ran and played games just fine from both OS's.
This was me 100% a few years ago. I've been working on it, and here are some things that may or may not help you.  Confidence is the #1 thing. If I'm feeling confident at that time, then I will look people in the eye. If I'm running an event and I know everything that I might need to know about it, I'll feel confident; if I came there empty-handed and need to ask for advice or second-guess my decisions, I won't.  Then there are some simple things like appearance. If I'm dressed well, freshly shaved and showered, good cologne - it helps _a lot_ . It's still surprising to me how much it helps. Good appearance = a lot of confidence, and I can look people in the eye and talk better.  By the way, do you ever find yourself stammering or stumbling over words?
Get him to change the picture at that URL to a picture of balls. Always classic.
Oh, look at that - a confounding factor in the "moderate drinking decreases heart disease risk" hypothesis. Who would have ever guessed? Moderate drinkers are more healthful in general that abstainers or heavy drinkers.
Samurai Champloo, IMO.
My favorite quotes:  &gt;Kurt Busiek: “I see the fan community ... hoping that Disney will immediately fire Joe Quesada and reinstate the kind of comics they use to love back when Disney had no interest in Marvel ... And a lot of other things that don't seem likely, either.”  and  &gt;Erik Larsen: “**Potentially, this could open up new venues for Marvel books -- if they were to put spinner racks in Disney stores.** It would impact a lot of other movie studios if the Marvel properties are suddenly taken off the table. But it really comes down to how hands-on Disney chooses to be. If they look at the line as say, ‘Whoa -- these comics should be aimed at kids’ and start insisting that things change it could impact things a great deal -- from creators to fans. If they just leave the comics alone and concentrate on bringing these characters to life on the big and little screen things might change very little for the fan on the street. It's all pretty up in the air.”  and finally  &gt;Dan Vado: “Marvel is the big winner here. My opinion, Disney overpaid (and Disney *never* over pays for *anything*) so it is obvious that Disney sees a huge licensing bonanza from the characters well down the line. Marvel books will, at some point, gain a stronger bookstore distribution partner should they decide to have their books sold through Harper.”
I think you misunderstood the video to be honest.  A consultant was working with a *private sector* business about how to continue business while there is a large attack in London. This was because said company was located in 'the city', which is the name for an **AREA** of London, which is considered the financial centre of the world. This area is where most people consider there to be a large attack.  Clearly it is coincidental, but these 'drills' and contingencies are very common. When looking at probabilities relating to a certain date, just divide the number of large businesses in london by the number of days in a year and it's soon obvious that it isn't that unlikely at all.  As for the 9/11 drill, that was an actual government drill including the military, so it is clearly more startling, but again these drills are common, you just don't hear about them.
Why are there very few jokes about binary numbers?  Because 111, 1000, 1001.
You might be interested in this thread: http://getsatisfaction.com/mozilla/topics/stop_developing_firefox
They have sovereignty over their own bodies?  Next they'll say humans aren't owned by the state!
Thanks so much! 
&gt;USE CONDOMS OR YOU WILL GET AIDS.  This is not true.  You may catch the HIV from unprotected sex, and that HIV may result in AIDS, but neither of those is a certainty.
And he's right. Stick your head into the sand as much as you want.
Another tip for pealing garlic is to cut the root base off (just the tip) and then smack it with the side of your knife.  The skin falls off and it is ready for chopping/mincing.
Nice way to twist history.  No wonder the winners write it...that way the truth is told, unless you happen to be the loser!
article here: http://www.techcrunch.com/2009/08/27/25-years-later-first-registered-domain-name-changes-hands/
wow, i think i have read almost all of those except Swan Song... gotta go get that one next
Doctors also see more patients in worse shape than chiropracters do by an order of magnitude.  *spelling
STOP.  Whatever you're currently doing, STOP.   Now, just look around you for a second, thinking of nothing else but the world surrounding you.  Ask yourself "What do I see?"   No matter where you are when you do this, you're going to see some wonderful things:  If you're at home, you're going to see a house or apartment that 75 percent of the world's population would kill to have.   If you're on the way somewhere, you're going to see a mode of transportation (bus, car, bicycle) that 75 percent of the world's population would kill to have.   If you're at the library, you're going to see a stack of knowledge that's greater than what 75 percent of the world's population would kill to have.   On the surface, western culture is so geared toward moving up that if you aren't, you seem worthless in our eyes.  That simply isn't true.  Some of us are waiting to bloom, and our societies are actually pretty okay with that-sometimes we have to support others while they figure out who they are best to become.  You, and I, are those.  I send out a heartfelt thanks to everyone who's supported me while I figure it out-which I have.  And I'm excited about the opportunity to give it back.   I'm 30.  So that means you have plenty of leeway to figure out where you're going in order to be productive to the rest of us.  And I think someone along the way will thank you for it.   So for now, trust in that; it will happen.  I've personally seen it.   Edited: for clarification.
Isn't "nippolopolis" from a South Park ep?
Micturate?
you may be able to quit this job and collect unemployment citing dangerous working conditions. yes these are difficult economic times, but your life is priority 1. If you feel threatened, this is a viable reason to terminate your employment.  I don't know what city you live in, but do some investigation into your states unemployment details. 
That's fucking rad!
Yeesh, with a title like that I was expecting you to have done it to a **live** pig.  Fucking letdown.
I use only linux (ubuntu) because Windows is so bugfuckingly frustrating to use that I can't stand it. I hate its default theme, its lack of features (compared to linux, especially the small usability things in gnome). I hate having to install drivers just to get my network card to work, which leads me to hating having to reinstall it every so often because of the virus problems. It all just sucks. Macs are ok, but I still hate a lot about them too, plus I can't afford one.
[I'm sorry, I love you](http://sparkplugged.net/wp-content/uploads/starlove.png)
&gt;Don't you see my point.  Again, this is a question, so it would be appropriate to use a question mark.  Unless it was a command.  And to answer the question which did have a question mark, because we're an annoyance.
My thoughts on the matter:  http://feedmelikeyoumeanit.blogspot.com/2009/08/boycott-whole-foods-i-think-not.html
Excellent
That was the first I've heard of it.  But then, I'm a bit of a Reddit newb.
No he wouldn't. Hitlers interest was only in Eastern Europe. The reason why he went after most of Europe was because France and the UK either declared war on Germany,tried to invade certain countries or helped certain countries fight against the Germans.  Either way the best way to stop the war would have been Weimar Germany.
The Rugburns had a song about that... kinda.  Detachable Penis
As long as you're not intolerant of them, then you're not racist.
"Just make sure you spell everything wrong and swear a lot."
Sure can!  All you have to do is ignite a couple million pounds of rocket fuel and use that as your flash.  
Yet more proof that even communism was better than capitalism. 
Like *that* gets you called faggot!
http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Kissing_number
Is it wrong that I find you extremely attractive, I mean you're only 4 years older them my daughter. But on the other hand you're only 14 years younger then me.
Leia has cankles.
Actually, it can be as discriminatory as you want -- you just can't do it because someone's black, buddhist or pregnant.  That is, unless you run a company with under 15 employees. Then you can fire all the brown people and get away with it.
Seems pricey for a VPS... better pricing with as-good-or-better SLAs are all over the place (slicehost, linode, prgmr)...  Maybe I just don't "get" the advantage/what they've done to make it extra Django-friendly
doogie92 is Hitler.
This is going to sound a little wacky, but make sure your jaw muscles are relaxed.  I've found that when I can't get to sleep, I'm unconsciously clenching my teeth, and focusing on relaxing will end up with me passing out within a few minutes.
Store brands do not hold a candle to:  Tater Tots  Tillamook Cheese  Starkist Tuna  Kraft Mayo  Generally for food, if the store brand is as good as the brand name then you can probably make even better at home from scratch: yogurt, canned veggies and beans, tomato products, canned fruits and jams, bread, pasta, soup, desserts, etc.
It's giving away my age - but I always thought City Limits with Christopher Ward and Kim Clarke Champniss was good... and Simon Evans did a good job there as well.
If you ever wondered whether or not Dennis Kneale is an idiot, all you have to do is read this.
&gt;so I can randomly downvote you one more time. I think you mean: "so I can intentionally downvote you one more time."  http://www.reddit.com/user/StopSayingRandom/ Go nuts!
&gt;&gt;As for your "the male form is more aesthetically pleasing"  I never said that, and that's what I was disagreeing with as well.
Try turning safesearch off. 
how about a puppy slowly being run over by a steam-roller?
http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=5Cbh2s5nZI0
When I first saw the scooter, I laughed, but what a great exercise. Seems essential for areas where there's bound to be a lot of bike traffic.
I haven't seen that, but it sounds similar to the [Ship of Theseus.](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Ship_of_Theseus)
Way to go reddit, it looks like we took the Episcopal Diocese of Eastern Oregon off the interwebs.  Picture Mirror: http://imgur.com/yhpfx.jpg
Oh right &lt;forehead slap&gt;
This is what I love about programming.  No matter how obscure an implementation choice or bug is, there will always be somebody that it is a HUGE DEAL to.
He meant to slime CNN and the BBC, but actually Al-Jazeera patterned themselves after CNN and the BBC, but don't have to sugarcoat certain issues that CNN and the BBC do for their audiences. I'm sure there are issues that Al-Jazeera sugarcoats for their own audience, too. But on some issues they give the straight dope. 
Mine looks like an upside down [Gonzo](http://www.mynameisearlkress.com/weblog/wp-content/uploads/2007/07/gonzo002.jpg).   In fact... with some creative use of face paint, I could dress my junk up as Gonzo for Halloween. 
&gt;Yeah, the health-care equivalent of food stamps is a free clinic  No.  The equivalent of a 'free clinic' would be a soup kitchen.  You can only go to that location, and you only get what they're offering.  With food stamps, citizens go into the exact same grocery stores I do, and can buy whatever they need/like (to the amount their food stamp allotment permits).  I know this to be a fact, because when I was a young 20-something just out of college, it would piss me off when I was in line at the grocery store - struggling to pay the bills - and someone would roll up behind me and buy all their groceries on food stamps, and pay cash for their booze and cigs.  Thankfully, I've since matured past that level of petty spitefulness.
i have this nasty fucking ketchup in my fridge. i forget what store it's from, but the brand is "Guaranteed Value". as far as i can tell, it's 50% ketchup, 50% water.
Everything except for itunes. Amarok works pretty well as a substitute but I still get itunes giftcards now and then as presents that I can't really do anything with.  Also I had a problem with my ipod where none of the songs were showing up but were still in memory, and the guy at the mac store told me to just resync it with itunes or something. When I told him I was using linux he looked at me like I was retarded. I still haven't gotten around to actually fixing it.
Welcome to the land of entertainment.  Movies have been doing this since the seventies
http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Controversies_about_the_word_%22niggardly%22
Octal is sadly one of them. (Die Octal! Die!)
Things are so much simpler and awesome upon retrospect.  I lacked the courage and ability at the time, although he was one of those meatheads that people never screw with, and most of them are lousy fighters because they've never been called on.
You're the one talking about proper logic and you pull that up? Is there any evidence to show that cannabis coffee shops within 250m of a school caused any sort of problem?
No light at the end of the tunnel? C'mon, not even a Memory of Light?  I've been reading these things for so long there's no way I can walk away at this point, but you might want to take a break until there's a consensus as to how at least the next book turns out. If you want to stay within the genre I'd recommend [Guy Gavriel Kay](http://www.amazon.com/Guy-Gavriel-Kay/e/B000AQ6VIO/ref=ntt_athr_dp_pel_1).  For me, the series was still 'good' through book 7, ACoS, though the latter books were not as good as the earlier. The really bad news is TPoD, WH, and CoT are pretty much not worth reading in my opinion. KoD picks up, but is still probably not even top 5 for the series. The whole Bowl of Winds plot was a huge waste of time, excluding Mat of course, Perrin's plot is a waste of time, and so is Elyane's. I would recommend reading the chapters with the characters you like and reading plot summaries for the boring ones. Loial gets sent on a mission and disappears for a while, and Jordan probably should have done this with the other characters too. But you can just [edit them out yourself](http://encyclopaedia-wot.org/books/index.html). 
You're a man of action I see...
Indeed it would. I'm not saying it would have been easy.... :)  But there is a way, and that particular amendment was getting kicked around quite a bit back in the 2000 debates.  Bush said he was for one, but once in office understood that doing it would be political suicide.  Plus, how does banning abortion make you or your buddies richer?  Why burn political capital on stuff that isn't going to make you or your buddies more money?
Is that "Don't feed the trolls"? Maybe there's something to this bible thing..
The prostitute actually has to put in time and effort to offer you the unlimited handjobs. there's no loss of time or product when someone downloads a video, regardless of what the spin doctors at the MPAA/RIAA want you to think. I'm not saying it's not theft. But it's also not a loss to them UNLESS the person downloading would have bought the movie if they couldn't have downloaded it.  As I pointed out previously, he already helped support the movie by buying a ticket. Chances are since he liked it so much he's going to spread some positive reviews about the movie (online, word of mouth whatever) which stand a chance of driving even more people to go see the movie. Some of them might even decide to buy the movie when it comes out.  And i think a lot of people who go to the movies, go because they want to go see it in a theater on a big screen. So while maybe some people would do as you suggest, i think most would not. Besides, how many people are going to want to go through the hassle of going to a theater either to just get the movie or to sit and watch it and then have to watch it again with their friends?  The movie and music industry tends to lose out by screwing thermselves. They want to maintain an iron fist control over everything when that is impossible. Instead of going with the flow and giving people what they want when they want it, they still want to try and stick to an outdated distribution system. So they suffer the consequences when people live in an age where you can have just about any content as soon as it's created.   Again i'm not really auguring morality here. I'm arguing more practicality.  I think they'd make more money if they just stopped trying to prevent every act of piracy and started becoming more 'on-demand' with content.
I eat bad movies for breakfast, but i had to pause Ultraviolet and take a nice long break after the POV flying through the reflections in the actors' sunglasses.
So it's common procedure for you to hear one piece of information at one point in time and apply it to all future opportunities regardless of new information?  Your most recent statement seems to imply that receiving new intelligence and reassessing your personal stand is "hiding under your desk and crying".  Sounds more like thinking with your head, and not with your Texas sized belt buckle.
i'm the same as "habbazoot". always when i'm really tired.
YOU FORGOT THE SEGA GENESIS!!! WTF AAARGGGH NOM NOM NOM!!! and the unicorns!
Well, hell, even putting it THAT way is less racist-sounding than what this woman said. None the less, I rather suspect in an actual social situation, you'd avoid saying the thing that made you sound racist.  Why make the sweeping claim about an entire ethnicity (and over a billion human beings) when you could just say, "Nah, I wasn't that into *her*?" Why make such a gigantic (and easily misinterpreted) generalization?
This is bullshit the video didn't even say that.  It said you would get fined if you were sick and didn't go into quarantine, not if you refused a vaccine.  Stop posting bullshit titles.
Agree: As a long time PC gamer, Halo was the game I learned the console FPS controls on.  It was the first console FPS that I wasn't constantly bemoaning the lack of a mouse.  As an aside, if you want other games to play through together, check out the Lego Star Wars games.
1. Persist 2. Try not to fuck up 3. If 2 not successful, learn 4. Try not to overthink 5. Go to 1
I tried liked hell to move to Colorado after last summer.  I didn't make it...
&gt; Regardless of how the information is obtained, it needs to be verified.  Except that information given willingly is statistically more often correct than information obtained under duress.  &gt; Also, are you under the impression that the pro-torture camp in not going for the crotch?  I was equating torture with going for the crotch.
[Looks pretty cool](http://www.eclipsephase.com/game).
I still don't see your point, drug pushers and the drugs war remain at a similar level, but by decriminalizing possession we stop so many innocent users' lives getting messed with. The number of kids with weed convictions whose lives get fucked with by that is absurd. Ultimately I'd agree with complete legalization but decriminalization of possession seems superior to the current state of affairs.
The lighting doesn't quite look consistent, but it's a hard call.
Sounds neat, although getting a bit beyond my depth :) Glad that people are looking into this stuff though!
If you are going to watch Apocalypse Now!, you might as well read Heart of Darkness.
yes
Hard left, lol. In a related story, McDonald's obsession with health food is driving away junk food fans. 
&gt;I don't understand this attitude that we need the government to decide who can and can't be fired but as lungfish59 points out, this is not an arrangement between equals either.  I work for you for three years, I'm good at my job, I have a mortgage, etc.   You decide one day that you don't like having anyone around who doesn't go to church every Sunday.  I might have a lot more to lose by you firing me than you do, so I'm effectively coerced into going to church (assume there are no other comparable jobs in the area - going to the competition means a big short-term loss for me). The gov't is (or should be) there to defend the rights of the less powerful against the more powerful.  I'm not saying it works that way in practice and I've worked jobs where there were people who needed to be fired but couldn't be - so I understand your POV, but there is something to be said for having gov't regulations to prevent abuse of power. 
Awesome! Thank you greatly! Those are the magic words. :)
Have you ever thought about starting your own porn studio so that you could have fairer working conditions for the acters/actresses and make more money yourself?
Behold! The Rabbot!
If you are not a quantum physicist...I applaud you good sir.
"2 be, R not 2B, that is the ?. Whether tis nobler in the mind to suffer the slings and arrows and stuff or kick ass."  -- Twitter by Mr. W. Shakespeare of the UK, author of Hamlet for the Blackberry
http://www.amazon.co.uk/Provos-IRA-Sinn-Fein/dp/0747538182  There's a book about terrorists.
My friend linked me to a pic of a convo like this a few weeks ago (originally was on 4chan I think):  **OP**: Has anyone else ever noticed that the urinals with automatic flushing have a glass plate with a light behind it? Wouldn't it be fucked if there was a camera in there taking picture of our cocks? Maybe the government is creating a database of all the cocks in the USA.  **ONLY REPLY TO THE THREAD**: If the government wanted a picture of every cock in America wouldn't it be more efficient to just put a camera in your mouth?  I thought it was a pretty sick burn.
what led into it?
Well, thanks for the link.
Well, as someone who is in the category of treating all races as equals without liking most of them sexually I must say it sounds entirely reasonable to me that she could be unclear in this manner
what led into it?
At this point its beyond safe to assume it means exactly what you think it means
usually people cite wmd's as a justification for invasion.  you make it sound like kennedy was defending the stupid and misguided invasion of iraq. also, you don't even make sense.  hiding crying?  kennedy is saying that even though he knows saddam has been trying to get wmd's for 10 years that he's still not afraid of him and doesn't consider him a threat.  that's the opposite of hiding crying.
() ;( ()... I'm crushing your head.
I certainly wish the best for your program.  There is little joy in beating up on a pathetic Indiana basketball team or a pathetic Michigan football team.  That being said, the last 25 years have little predictive value on what will happen in the next 5 years.  This is why the fans of most other schools hate you guys.  Everyone else talks about how their team is doing well and turning their program around.  You guys talk about how you used to be good so everyone else is stupid for thinking you'll be anything less than amazing.  It's pointless to argue about who the fair weather fans are, but it is fun to speculate.  I'll just say that you didn't see too many Michigan basketball fans for the last decade or so.  You never really know who's a die hard fan until you go into a season expecting to be terrible and without any real reason to expect you're going to quickly turn it around.  Anyway, good luck.  I hope your team isn't as god awful bad as I expect them to be and I hope you're able to avoid NCAA sanctions.  As of now, you have current players turning your program in for violations.
My roommate and I were hammered at a bar the other night... He was flirting with a girl who apparently was non-plussed by how drunk he was. She said something along the lines of: "Get away from me. You're drunk and disgusting." He said without missing a beat: "Yeah, well tomorrow I'll be sober. But you'll still be a bitch."
Privacy is one thing you must give your child. If you do not you will lose your relationship with your child.   If you have already lost intimacy and trust with your child then you've already lost. Do whatever you want and it won't matter.  My mother was a snooper and read all of my personal mailetc. Found out about a pregnancy and planned abortion and one night asked me to sit down for a talk with her and dad.   It was twelve years before I ever told them anything of any substance about my life.  It is not worth it to spy on your children. Unless you suspect imminent suicide you are bette off talking to them. A lot. Edit: Your child feels the need for a lock, why? 
It can be if it's a tyrannicide.
This is a terrible way to organize a library. Boo!
Bullshit yourself.  You're the one selling the same old nonsense about SS and Medicare.  When will the sky finally fall, friend?
Hitler  Bush Stalin  Johnson   Obama   Bush Jr   Nixon  Clinton  Reagan   Ya know what they all have in common?   http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=xtqy4DTHGqg   Yup, sing it loud and proud while they kill others in your name!
Ok, I'm going to try that. You'll get my picture in a few days.
Don't ignore that knife hone you have.  It makes a significant difference which will make your chore more accurate, easier and safer.   
Everything is proceeding according to plan.
Yeah, to get paid, I need to put a lien against her accounts/property.  Which is basically another whole case.
captain Olimar? is that you?
Blogspam. Actual MediaMatters headline...  [Beck suggests that Obama administration *will use bombings* of Canadian pipeline to justify takeover of oil companies](http://mediamatters.org/mmtv/200908310028)  politicususa.com is just as stupid and reactionary as Glenn Beck.
Sometimes, [Alcohol](http://beer.thetazzone.com/images/drinkBeer9.jpg) is the answer... that is all. 
Ah, pardon me - I confused you with the parent comment. It's still early, where I am.
*Wipes a small tear away from his eye.* Reddit, you are just too amazing.  Honestly, though that is amazing. Thanks for the tip.
How much weight have you gained?
That's a pretty sweet return on marshmallows.
In reply to the deleted reply, even *rhetorical* questions require a question mark.
pro tip: American cars suck, why do you think people stopped buying them? After years of pumping out giant shitwagons that break down 3 weeks later and fighting tooth and nail to keep fuel efficient cars out of the country I am elated to finally see gm and the others crumbling to dust. Good Riddens
Some of the more aggresive HoAs issue pantone cards for their lawn nazis and the wrong shade of green gets you fined. If you think that's not bad enough, some "cities" are home owner associations. Two examples are Highlands Ranch, CO and Coral Springs, FL. 
Yea, I was actually surprised to have several comments today, I wrote that over a week ago. I have the luxury of living in a hick town full of gun stores. I might not find anything full auto, which I didn't want anyway, but I have plenty a very healthy selection within a half mile of my house. I find a vehicle with enough gas and there are gun stores nearby with .30 machine guns, small mortars (don't ask), .50 rifles, and all kinds of other shit that even the most ardent second amendment supporter has trouble justifying.
It's due in part to xmonad.
That song is so good. Thanks.
They ought to view it as unconstitutional, but the Supreme Court is politically appointed to enforce the views of their appointers, and often cave to public pressure.  I cite the case of Dred Scott v. Sanford.
The downloads tend to be faster. In this case the initial download from Steam was about 20-30x faster than the patch we had to get from NCsoft's servers.  Also brand loyalty. Valve gets a cut, if not always then usually. Maybe the more money they make the more sales they have, the more indie games they pick up. Probably not.  And then there's the usual community stuff - the Xfire-style friend lists, who is playing what, your forum cliques. No other reason, really.
Hmmm, calling smart, creative people monkeys and **I'm** the elitist? All I'm saying is that nobody has a choice. The advertising model is dying and we have to find something to take its place. Just as video killed the radio star, the internet is killing the commercial break. With the internet we have a thousand, thousand channels to choose from and hundreds of friends to help us find the diamonds in the dirt.
I close my eyes and pretend to be sleeping.  Eventually,  I am.
It reminded me of the scene from Dawn of the Dead where the footage of zombies was coupled with the music The Gonk (a rather twee affair). Clearly I can distinguish between the realities of Shell Shock and the fiction of Zombification, but none the less the mixture of absurd physical movement (and the related sorrow of such condition) with upbeat music made me laugh then as much as now. I will forever adore black comedy and doubt I will ever understand these people who feel the need to inform me as to what is and isn't funny.
Aren't Magnums just wider than longer, for the most part? WSGTFM?
I can't stand anything from Unibroue until it's had at least a year or so to age and soften up.  Their house yeast makes the fizziest, harshest carbonation I've ever seen, and I dislike it for the same reason I dislike fizzy soda.  However, the 2002 [Quelque Chose](http://ratebeer.com/beer/unibroue-quelque-chose/1924/) that I split with some friends a while back was one of the finest beers I've ever had.  Dead flat, and freaking spectacular.
*y'all
You know, it's a lot less convincing when you've got that asterisk there indicating you've changed your comment after posting it.
The best drink I've ever had is Glenfidich 30 (a wedding gift from my wife). Well, maybe a bottle of 1996 Dom Perignon (another wedding gift, which we drank the night our daughter came home for the first time, after spending her first two weeks in the hospital).
Well,  she is cute and talented (IMHO and all of course),  so I guess yes.  (the last time someone noticed a resemblance between myself and a celebrity,  the comparison was made with Javier Bardem -- a fine actor IMHO -- but in his role as Anton Chigurh.... I am still wondering whether to feel complimented on this one or not.) 
The first thing my teacher said was "Arab terrorists"
I'm from Buenos Aires living in the US. It is a great city lots of gorgeous chics, good food, you never stop spending money, good chances you are going to make friends easily. What line of business are you in. I have lots of friends there. Depending on the neighborhood you are planning to live the experience you are going to have there. Is like New York, if you live in the Bronx you will have one kind of experience, if you live in Brooklyn another. Palermo is good, Palermo Holywood is not expensive and good. Belgrano is classy, Barrio Norte is massive and middle class. Don't wait to be seated, the best combo in a restaurant, appetizer, chorizo, provoleta and ensalada mixta. Translation, sausage, thick slice of provolone cheesee grilled, and LTO salad, after that sasado de tira (short ribs) with papas ala provenzal (french fries, with garlic and parsley), dessert, flan mixto, (flan with dulce de leche and whipped cream)  Hope you enjoy, always be careful! Everybody is friendly and everybody speaks some english  The city is massive 
There's no need to apologize, commander, as the only kind of freak I see you as is a freak in the sack... let me be the cure for your pon farr.
Has anyone in this family ever seen a chicken?
The point about ultimatums strikes a chord.  I had a family member in the military call recently for advice regarding his girlfriend that wanted to get married within the next year.  They are in a long distance relationship and he didn't think he was in the correct spot for it.  After counseling him about it (I recently exited a long-term relationship in which my ex and I had considered marriage), I talked to my dad on the phone a while later, who has been through 3 divorces.  He postured that sometimes ultimatums can come from someone in a relationship when they really don't want to be in the relationship anymore and they don't want to look like the bad guy/girl by doing the dumping. So the ultimatums come, until at some point the other party can't make a concession and the relationship is over.
Yawn ad hominem yawn.
Not many read it for that reason, but how many have to?  Only one!  But you libs don't care about other peoples lives or property, so what do you care as long as it's interesting, right?  Typical attitude  from a generation without morals.
Prices are still falling.  Markets do tend to overshoot (not sure how much so with this much stimulus, but you can't throw money at a problem forever).  Just buy when the Case Shiller index is down to average levels.  Interest rates are bound to go up (unless if we go into japan mode) which will price many people only of the market.  Housing prices are a function of wages, and when people start becoming priced out, housing prices will fall.  http://www.ritholtz.com/blog/2009/07/update-case-shiller-100-year-chart/   The question is, would you rather have a expensive house with a low interest rate or a cheap house with higher interest rate?  If you are the saver, then the latter will be a big bonus for you, just continue saving.
I have read the postings below with great interest.  Whilst I can fully agree with most of your views and opinions.  I particularly took interest in your comments;  "I intend to one day dress "fulltime" at work but I am not pursuing a sex change nor expect to be refered to as a female."  and  "I would prefer to appear genderless/androgynous but that wouldn't change my preference to be referred to as a male." May I then ask, why do you choose to adopt the name 'Mary Jane' over your male identity whilst dressed?  If you are just expressing your desire to dress and look more feminine (just like a person may choose to change their hair colour or style), as part of your freedom to present yourself wihout the constraints defined by todays society. 
For the lazy: http://www.flickr.com/photos/elbertfs/3872799396/sizes/l/
At Otago, undergrad stuff is based around a number of points, that are given to you by papers (different classes). You get so many points at 1st year, 2nd year, 3rd year (and if you choose, 4th year), and they give you a degree.  Grad is slightly different, you've gotta find a supervisor, and get approval for a project. 
I like this idea, but only if you're not really all that concerned about an emergency. The fact is, if there's a real emergency, you're going to want access to that room a lot faster than going to fetch the your keys and unlocking it. Of course, if it's one of those flimsy indoor doors that a strong gust of wind could knock over, then it doesn't matter, just kick the thing in, but if there really is an issue with emergency access, then a key is not the way to go.
Just because the pope talks crap doesn't mean the examiner has to talk crap as well and, more importantly, doesn't mean I have to listen to either of them talking crap. Global warming isn't caused by atheists and it's not caused by the religious - any fuckwit that tries to claim either is just using a handy topical issue to push their agenda with. Read the whole speech, the interpretation that he's blaming atheism for global warming in the sense talked about in the article is one that requires so much reading into it that it's slightly ridiculous.  Let me guess... this is part of /r/atheism's new and openly declared strategy of posting their stuff outside of /r/atheism because they're no longer a default front page sub-reddit. 
I bet she watches Fox.
any time.
I think 'straight' is a poor choice here...
Would *you* be thinking about the marijuana in your pocket if you came home to find your family murdered?
Stumped it with Anna from Briggs' Alpha and Omega series.
The only reason we should fund NASA is because we are dumb.  This planet will be ruined in &lt;10 generations and we need to find another place to be dumb...and fast.
I did a brief stint at a major computer retailer as a tech support.  A large woman came in with a dead in the water computer, which turned out to just be some faulty seated ram.  The surprise was a desktop photo of said large woman, inserting a toy fire hydrant (probably 6-8 inches and wide) in her ass.  Why she wanted her own computer to boot up to a pic of herself like that is beyond me.
I want to punch Soulja Boy in the face.
I don't speak for the field.  The field speaks for itself in the form of peer reviewed publications.  I suggest you find such a publication and educate yourself as to the widely affirmed existence of natural monopoly.  Do you also deny evolution or the lunar landing?
Hah! Of course, "people" is plural already. My bad. :)
I use it at work because it's what the company uses, although I picked where to work in part based on their intelligent (and eminently practical) choices of technology.  I use it at home chiefly because it's the system I know best. I've never been a Windows user, having evaluated it back in the 3.x days and never having found it suitable to my needs. I used DOS back then; went to Mac for college and stayed there for a while (roughly the System 7.5 through early OS X era); and a bit of BeOS and OpenBSD here and there.  A lot of the benefits of Linux stem from software freedom. Even if you don't believe the political side of it, you still benefit from consequences such as ...  * No lock-in. You can switch distros easily and maintain compatibility. Don't like Ubuntu? All your files will work on SuSE. * No DRM. The system is designed to do what you want, not what the media industry wants. * No deliberate obfuscation! Your MP3 player software doesn't try to hide your MP3s from you to make it harder to move away, like iTunes does. * There are customized distros for particular purposes, like the [Eeebuntu](http://www.eeebuntu.org/) I use on my Asus EeePC netbook. * End-users never, ever have to worry about licenses or piracy. * Open software development means nobody can get away with sneaking anti-features like spyware into the next release of their stuff. * If your system gets hozed, you can reinstall without calling tech support to get a new license key.  There are plenty of other benefits too. Just a few of them ...  * Package repositories and apt/yum/etc. Most applications software is distributed via the same channel as the OS itself. Even though it's not written by the same folks, it's tested for compatibility. * Security. No, it's not perfectly secure. Yes, there's such a thing as malware for Linux. Yes, some of the security is due to being a minority system. But you will spend *much less* time and effort dealing with malicious software on Linux than on Windows. * Customization. Can't read the default fonts? Change 'em. There's no Steve Jobs telling you not to monkey with his sacred User Experience. * Scaling up. Linux can use your quad processor machine efficiently. * Scaling down. You can make a minimal Linux that will run fine on an old or low-power machine (e.g. that EeePC I mentioned above).
Maybe I am you're friend? o_O
She goes by Gabby from Femjoy and several other names. http://www.model-archive.com/femjoy/gabby/the_name_of_the_rose/ and here is a link from peachy-forum with several galleries of her photos.   http://peachyforum.com/forums/p/166044/538939.aspx
Well, I'm a redheaded guy, so have an upvote.
So this happened... Tuesday 27 March 2007 ... 2 years ago... are you fucking kidding me? Is this what the almighty internet has come to? diffusing 2 year old material? 
Is Voor Pagina a spoonerism?
Do you think it's stupid to be agnostic and whatever the equivalent is regarding this subject? Open to the possibility? I think the only fact on either matter is that *nobody knows*.
Someone needs to invent some kind of internal timing device that lets cameras automatically take pictures for you after a certain time... oh wait.
The hazards of redditing stoned.
I agree. I'd totally go the general anesthetic route if you are in good health and (but big caveat) you can afford the additional cost.  I'm the world's biggest chicken when it comes to the dentist, and having 4 wisdom teeth pulled under general anesthetic was a breeze.
No, unless you are talking about one race in particular.
When they first announced Bluetooth in technical periodicals way back in the 90s, one of the aims was packet transfer between random in range devices so that data can get A to B any whichway, I believe the term is scatternet, I can't say anybody mentions this in any Bluetooth discussion or advertising these days, does this work ? 
I will also mention that she doesn't say, "I'm usually only attracted to white men."  She specifically said *date.*  She only DATES white men. And there's a lot more to dating than just physical attraction.  Or, at least, I'd hope that's true for most people.   But otherwise, it could well be that she found him quite handsome and\or charming and still refuses to see him again simply because he's not-white.  And, once again, if she didn't find him physically attractive, or disliked his personality, why in the blazes wouldn't she say so? Why would she instead write into an advice columnist asking for people to tell her that it's OK to dismiss a blind date solely because of his skin tone?
&gt;That's one of the most disrespectful things you can do.  The most disrespectful thing you can think of, is not standing up for the pledge? Nobody takes it seriously. You're standing up to talk to a flag. That sounds crazy if you ask me.   &gt;yet it's okay for them to be disrespectful, and it's not okay for my daughter to speak her mind," said Mark Lawrence, Heather's father. "That's her First Amendment right. That's her freedom of speech."  I think you got it all mixed up, dad, *your* daughter was the disrespectful one who infringed on other people's first amendment right. 
Oh man, that poor lady.
oklahoma city.
Yea I came here to say the same thing.  Bud Light Lime is like the Nickelback of beers.
I say stop worrying and learn to love the bomb.
I completely agree!!! I am writing papers, and doing work that involves math, but is not centred around it. These kinds of posts, where an attribute or a mathematical description, helps me come to some conclusion in my own work (whether or not to contain graphs), makes this reddit accessible to me and my kind.   Keep up the good work!
I am smoking a bowl for you as we speak XD
Child comment upvoted more than the parent = awesome.
The bigger question: for what divine reason do we eat? Could we not run on some magic power?  edit: some relevance to the question: God *could* cure the hunger problem by having had designed us without the need to eat.  edit: instead of downvoting please explain why this question is not worthy of being answered, or indeed answer it.
discoveries in math are definitely made through experimentation and observation!  proofs for theorems generally come after the idea for the theorem itself.  the idea typically comes from playing around with a system.  the difference between math in science is that the "experiments" of math are wholly abstract.  
WTF!?
War deaths aren't what makes Hitler Hitler, we expect those, every war has them.  What makes Hitler Hitler was the Holocaust, the attempted genocide is the evil beyond the expected evil of any war.
Read ["The Structure of Scientific Revolutions."](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Thomas_Samuel_Kuhn#The_Structure_of_Scientific_Revolutions) by Thomas Kuhn
It also made the modern world possible, and therefore a world where people weren't condemned to a life as illiterate serfs with a life expectancy of 30.
The same plan they used in Nam.
&gt; religion - a cause, principle, or system of beliefs held to with ardor and faith  I like how you based your argument off of the 4th (and last) definition they provide for religion.  Instead, I'll base mine on the etymological root of the word: (emphasis mine)  &gt; Middle English religioun, from Anglo-French religiun, Latin religion-, religio **supernatural** constraint, sanction, religious practice, perhaps from religare to restrain, tie back  Religion requires a supernatural component, and most atheists would argue against the notion of the supernatural. &gt; Godel created a system based on just true and false as "axiom" equivalents and determined there would be independent statements.  No... he proved that any such formal system that is as complicated as arithmetic is inherently incomplete.  You should actually read about how Godel broke a major assumption that mathematicians had held on to since Euclid.  &gt; Math itself relies on axioms which must be accepted by faith, famously 6 in Euclidean Geometry, changing one or more generates an equally valid Geometry.  No, only changing the last (which is actually the 5th axiom) creates new geometries (which are defined as non-euclidean).  Also, if you think it requires "faith" to see that 1 + 1 = 2, then you're obviously giving the term too much power.  &gt; Claiming that "Science and Logic" are the only all encompassing truth is a religious belief.  Science and logic aren't truths.  Science and logic are tools for understanding truth.
I'm not getting any karma for it, if that makes you feel better.
I don't think there's any way to prevent this, but you can fire someone for a racist/sexist reason and claim that their breath smelled bad. I don't think US laws should be like NZ's, but let's not kid ourselves -- you can discriminate as much as you want, so long as you don't put it down on the pink slip.  there's no way to prove it either way
And for that sir, you get another blue arrow!
What's your favourite video of yourself?  Are you bi? Do girls-on-girls turn you on or is it just acting? Weirdest thing you've done in your opinion?
SC2 will probably see parabolic sales in Korea.  Right now, people are very skeptical about what to think about SC2.  Think of when the XFL came out... how dare they rethink our country's sport?
Petrified Moon Trees!
downvoted for foolish use of downvote
at the time I assumed that it was the "S" for Michigan State, but now looking at it, it doesn't really look like the "S" symbol for Michigan State...
I can't prove it but based on the angle and use of mirror I feel she placed the camera on a chair w/ self timer.
Well, there are recycled plastic options. I mean, it is only a concept. Not made yet. And I would think that the one time plastic creation for these far out weighs the damage of pumping oil
congratulations quietlight, you are the new P-Dub.. GET BACK TO WORK! 
All Marvel comics will now be edited so as to be SUITABLE FOR ALL AUDIENCES.
i have seen some fucked up shit on some of the hard drives we get in at work, im not even going to bother telling you, simply because you probably wont believe me.
&gt; Just like it's not sexist to only be attracted to one gender. Based on the Kinsey studies, exlusively heterosexual people or exclusively homosexual people are pretty rare.   
It's not mj, it's a synthetic cannabinol that does a good job of feeling like the real thing in small doses. And it doesn't show on any screening. ;)
gripe regarding bacon meme
I agree, easiest is external monitor to the VGA connector, then Function F4 (hold down Fn key, while tapping F4).
My friend once accosted me with "You son of a bitch!" then immediately  followed up in the most sincere voice with "No, no... your mom's not a bitch, she's very nice, I didn't mean... But you never answered my question earlier..."
After I dismembered and skinned it in the same front yard where my brother's dog pees?  Alas, no.
*God is an Astronaut* has a similar style and also very good.
Did you mean [Jeep Wrangler](http://images.google.com/images?q=jeep%20wrangler&amp;oe=utf-8&amp;rls=org.mozilla:en-US:official&amp;client=firefox-a&amp;um=1&amp;ie=UTF-8&amp;sa=N&amp;hl=en&amp;tab=wi)?  Or [Dodge Durango](http://images.google.com/images?q=dodge%20durango&amp;oe=utf-8&amp;rls=org.mozilla:en-US:official&amp;client=firefox-a&amp;um=1&amp;ie=UTF-8&amp;sa=N&amp;hl=en&amp;tab=wi)?  There is no Dodge Wrangler.
Man, I thought that little red and white bag (bottom right, clipped to the blue board) was a dimmer. Lol'd.
Yup! Never call the cops for such a mediocre act of child misbehavior. Apparently parents whom have done such a thing are pathetic ass parents anyways... incapable to even address simple wisdom and control upon their own children(s).  If this were ever to be true... humankind has truly fallen... replacing all our individual moralities by submissively relying upon governmental involvement in every aspect of social problems is very stupid, indeed!
Yah, I love these concepts. Opens so many doors!
should have gave them [this](http://www.downloadmoreram.com/).
2D, monochrome, mirror's edge.
Ya, some verification would be nice.
Yet you seem to have accepted the Wired/Lynds story wholeheartedly. Did you verify its claims?  I did attempt to verify them some years ago, and instead discovered what I now know - that Lynds is an outright fake.
&gt; Hell, you can culture the yeast from their bottles if you want to.  Actually, I don't think you can because they centrifuge the beer before bottling and pitch a clean lager yeast into the brew for bottle conditioning.  Many breweries use this technique to help protect their house strains.
I love that song!
liquor in the front...poker in the rear
&gt;Also check out Hitchcock's work; I won't name specifics because you cannot possibly go wrong when picking out a Hitchcock film to watch.  Oh yeah you can.  I love, love, love, love, love Hitchcock's body of work overall, but please don't send anyone blindly into any of the following: *Jamaica Inn, The Paradine Case, Stage Fright, The Wrong Man, Torn Curtain, Topaz, Family Plot*.  I'm no *The Trouble With Harry* fan either, but I know it has its defenders.  But thank you for reminding me that I still haven't seen *Le Samourai*.  That's a gaping hole in my film knowledge that I intend to fill.
&gt; Socialism for the rich and corporations, dog-eat-dog capitalism for regular people.  A.K.A. fascism.  (inb4 "no nazis on the streets" -- fascism is not a fashion trend gaga about uniforms with boots.)
What's your beef with bisexuality and asexuality? 
"Science is what we understand well enough to explain to a computer.  Everything else is art."  D. Knuth
You should use more lube.
Is your name Ashley?
I used to draw this also (NZ school)... I always figured it was the superman symbol
Hugged my friend.
I have a wonderful affordable housing plan.  Just stop with the nonsense of propping up the housing market. Every city on the east and west coast has an affordable housing problem.  The government is trying to provide affordable housing on the one hand, and propping up the housing market on the other.  Ridiculous.
I had linux for six months on my netbook, and I wound up switching to windows because it just works. Flash video, games, nearly any program under the sun are designed for windows. Sure linux is great if you know how to program and have the time to work in command line to fix problems. Average people want to be able to just use their computers.
At least they died worm free...
Do you have any links to reports indicating a -7 change in NZ?
My grandparents are dead  way to go ass
Incredibly unlikely. [This report - pdf - ](http://www.radiationresearch.org/pdfs/reasons_us.pdf) (not a study) is a summary of previous studies, summarized by [a group of people](http://www.reddit.com/r/Health/comments/9fwaf/cellphones_cause_brain_tumors_says_new_report_by/c0cmpky) who are well known to back a strong "EMF is evil, OMGZ!" perspective.  It adds nothing new to the table, except to say that the studies they chose to focus on, if they are interpreted in a specific way, say that cell phones cause cancer. Contrary to what 95% of research actually says on this matter, but if you ignore that 95%, then yes, cell phones appear to cause brain cancer.  re: wireless internet. There are some good explanations as to why it is incredibly unlikely that wireless internet is going to do anything to your body [here](http://www.reddit.com/r/technology/comments/94zgo/why_no_one_is_allergic_to_wifi_a_debunking_of/). There was also another comment somewhere I read a while ago explaining the physics behind how the power of wireless internet signals is insignificant compared to other sources of microwave radiation of the same frequency we're exposed to more routinely (ex: your microwave, chordless phones, etc.), but I can't find it at the moment.
Hah, I was a little boy with long blonde hair, and that used to happen to me all the time, difference is, I didn't give a shit.  And now I'm a big boy with long hair (not as blonde).
You obviously haven't played Fallout 3.
AND you can [cut a cake](http://www.rahulsood.com/2008/05/ugh-it-was-my-birthday.html) with it.
&gt; make a judgment about how much suffering is enough  Except it's easy to see there are some types of suffering that are neither deserved nor useful lessons. What lesson is learned by the infant on the airplane that crashes into the ocean? What lesson is learned by the child who dies painfully from some genetic defect?  Sure, maybe you let your kid get hurt as a lesson. But you don't let your kid get hurt when there's no lesson to be learned. You don't wish cancer on your children in order that they may better learn how to cope with having cancer.
Definitely Psychonauts   Every "mental world" is a work of art.  As everyone knows, every level you visit is the mind of a character you meet.  Each new mental world you enter is more complex (emotionally and psychologically) than the last one, and by the time you finish a level, you feel that you helped and can connect with the character, or at least understand why he is like that.   For example, you enter the mind of:  * A former actress who became bi-polar after her mother committed suicide. She cannot perform anymore due to her constant mood-swings and a terrible inner critic that attacks everything that she does.  * A direct descendant of Napoleon Bonaparte who feels like a total wuss, and is tormented by the inferiority complex he feels by constantly comparing his accomplishments with his ancestor's life. (this level involves a risk-like board game, and you can interact with it like a normal board game, a rts or a fps at any time by getting deeper into the game. If you are walking around on the map and look up, you can see the ceiling of the room where you and Fred Bonaparte are playing the board game)  * An elite psy-agent, who on the surface seems absolutely logical and under control at all times, but in his mind he's constantly battling with his emotions and the memories of his mother (his mother died when he was really young, so when he developed psychical abilities as a kid, he used them to learn more about his mother by exploring his father's mind, so he became deeply disturbed by seeing his mother as a sexual figure)   There's a lot more worlds, some of them just plain silly/fun, like the mind of a fish where you are seen like a giant monster that terrorizes the citizens of Lungfishopolis.   The only criticism I have for this game is about the controls: you'll need a gamepad.  The basic gameplay is like a platformer, so trying to play with keyboard+mouse is terribly difficult (after all, this is a console game ported to pc)   Control issues aside, I think this is the best game I ever played.  (Edit: Typo)
I'm really at the edge of sit in reguards to deals that will be completed at the last minutes before the football window.with the likes of arsenal,liverpool and surprisenly man utd still needing to add to their squad.arsenal will surely add with wenger a culprit with last day signings.viera likely or the saint etienne chap or chiamak.man utd might return with an increased bid for stephen ireland.
Do you have a creative tie-in between your work and the people that you don't like?
I thought I would never reveal this secret to reddit or the rest of the world but...pasta with ranch dressing.  It tastes *so* good and makes me very happy late at night.
This was the only time I've ever upvoted a homework comment.
You have no authority to judge whether I do enough to oppose the forces of fear and ignorance.  You do not even know me.  Please do not pretend that you get to condemn me based on your speculation about what I do and do not attempt. It is not my fault, and never has been, that others are incapable of distinguishing my conduct from the conduct of others, simply because we share a label.  You are irrational and unfair to contend otherwise.
They are good short stories, or beginnings to stories, but i cant help feel frightened for the saftey of the people close to this person, you cant write like that without being at least a little unhinged. This person has talent. I know this is just a creative outlet but it still makes me feel uncomfortable, at the same time, they should try and publish some of those, they are good, if terrifying, they seem to hit the dark spot of my psyche.
I won't believe you until you tell crazy stories.
This isn't going to help America's problem with drugs. We have to eliminate the demand. People on welfare tend to use a lot of drugs because they're ugly and lazy and poor and they smell funny.   They don't want jobs. They don't want to work. They just want to sit around all day and do drugs. Why should my tax money go to their welfare system? Why should they get food stamps? They're just gonna die of an OD anyway. If they had any brains they would go get a job.  I know it sounds awful, but we should just kill poor people. It's not like they contribute to society anyway.
The French health care system is the best in the world. 
I call it "right-wing" because I'm referring to conservative, traditionalist dogma. I say "logical reaction" when I'm talking about things based on empirical evidence or cause-and-effect reactions.   &gt;You're claiming your town, which doesn't see as much drug tourism, has less of a problem. Wouldn't that logically follow? Do only right-wing zealots live on the border of the Netherlands?   Uhhh....stop taking leaps of logic. Now. That does not logically follow. We have zero problems due to cannabis tourism here.   And you know what? Lets see the statistics showing the Dutch *do* have a tangible problem. Like...actual...I don't know....proof of the assertions you make?  I don't even see what you're trying to make clear. The card system sounds kind of stupid. As in, a waste of money and a good way to shun tourists. Nice.
Close.
or this: http://baseballsnatcher.mlblogs.com/Rich-redneck-rv.jpg  or this: http://mudfacemarge.com/R9limo
I don't know, there aren't any ears.
oh yeah, the light spot on the horizon is lightning, not city lights. there were some pretty spectacular displays that night, but i wasn't able to capture any, unfortunately.
Great article about an incredible man!
I almost wrote about how if you are a real patriot you are supposed to burn a flag that has touched dirt, then I noticed your user name.
How is it that Putin is turning a blind eye to this?  It seems that they were demanding a regime change.
This would be excellent material for an introductory stats class.  EDIT: I fixed **a** typo.
Would somebody Google that for me
Girl: Tom, what's the difference between a cake and a tart?  Me: Well, a cake is a baked good made out of flour, sugar and eggs, whereas a tart is your mother. 
sad downvoted attempt to end pun thread
Chinese are going to destroy the world, one species at a time.
Poor jessica.
hell yeah
it is!
Not sure why it's getting downvoted, the article is making a point.  People will tend to extol one religion or spirituality as "better" or "more pure" than another, but corruption can be seen for all people, everywhere.  You may complain about Catholic priests misusing their authority and influence, but that isn't a Catholic issue, it's a power issue. This has always been the case for positions of authority, whether its spiritual or political.  That doesn't mean there aren't good Shamans, or good priests, but remember that they are still only human.
See ya there!
English Lit major here. I couldn't stand Naked Lunch. I guess I'm not of a high enough intelligence :(
... i'm looking for a bad boy like you &lt;3 how about tonight?
An add for prostitution most likely. 
I guess I am just wondering how organized this will be.  Will there be a theme a month?  Will there be 10 posts a day asking for various community posts?  .... I don't know why I'm thinking about it this much.  It's GW; the whole point is fun.  If someone wants to do a theme, they will.  And of course there are the arrows.  If it's a popular idea, it'll be upvoted enough.  *And thanks :)
Dude, it was hard enough controlling a dead pig while I hacksawed its legs.
Is that xfce? You could perhaps try [OpenGEU](http://opengeu.intilinux.com/Home.html) which is Ubuntu + the Enlightenment E17 desktop, so you get some pretty eye candy without using up too much resources. 
The Metamorphosis. I got almost all the way through, but someone ruined the ending so I never finished it. I know it had a great message and was an existentialist work of art, but damn was it boring. Oh, and The Catcher in the Rye. Worst book about baseball ever...
But the parents are oppressing their kids!  First they take away their doors, then before you know it they're censoring r/atheism and allying with Sears against narwhals, bacon, and Richard Dawkins..
It is small and efficient. Does what is needed very well.  My favorite, when I am using Windows.
Yep, especially living in Quebec when my first language is english, it's sometimes really hard to understand people who mumble with a french accent.  But sometimes it happens when I'm talking to anyone.  I feel kind of bad for it, but its' just so awkward asking them to repeat themselves over and over again.  I'm glad I'm not the only one.
And as evil and greedy as that is, it's not as evil as killing millions just because you don't like them.
well in terms of pounds of flour, it's approximately 2.23 refrigerators long. my math may be off though. 
This man is Kyle Gass.  Edit : minus an L
I was just walking down the street one day, by a homeless woman's shelter. I was dressed casually, jeans and a new t-shirt. An old lady was sitting out front. As I walked by, she turned me and hissed "You think your dressed like hot shit! But let me tell you, you're not. Your nothing!"
No issues here either.
Personally, the mass market appeal is what held me back from watching it for so long. I'd heard it was an amazing movie, but from far too many people. Turns out they were right. I'm a Kubrick/Tarkovsky kind of guy, and I thought the film was beautifully shot, and I nearly cried at one part. It was just hard to believe something could live up to its reputation that well.
What? No, I don't swing that way, sorry.
I've made many stupid remarks like that too, never to someone who was disabled but dumb things that I find funny that other people don't.  Downvote away  =[
This was a great one I saw about 15 years ago. So far, I haven't heard any that even came close to topping it.  I was taking a special University program for kids who excelled in the sciences at the University of South Florida-Tampa. We were taking a Biology lab, standing around in our lab coats and peering through our microscopes. One of the girls there, Meghan, did very well in the program - so well, in fact, that she got A's on everything. In this class, though, she must have got a stray B somewhere, because she was whining loudly to everyone within earshot that her smattering of B's might endanger her chance to score another A. It was irritating but all of us ignored it, going about our work in silence. Then, out of nowhere, we heard a loud voice boom out; we turned around and saw another student, David, leaning back with his arms spread out, saying:  OH MY GOD, NOW I'LL **NEVER** GET INTO HARVARD MEDICAL SCHOOL!!!  It was, without question, the sharpest, funniest, and most devastating comeback I've ever heard anyone deliver. What made it so great was that it was fearless - he belted it out like he was on Broadway, so loudly he could never back out if it fell flat. We could've stared at him awkwardly or let his joke just die there. Worse, there was a lab proctor in the room, and he could've come down hard on him for that. But instead, we all froze and listened, and it brought down the house. EVERYONE stopped what they were doing and doubled over laughing. Then Meghan started bitching about how that wasn't what she meant, c'mon guys, etc., etc., which made an already terrific joke almost painfully hilarious. They say timing is everything, and his timing was so right - everything we found annoying about Meghan, in one truthy line - that we couldn't stop laughing until she left the room. I laughed until there were tears in my eyes, as did all the people around me.   And, David, if you're reading this, let me tell you: I don't remember hardly any of the material I studied that summer, but I'll remember that joke until the day that I die.
You ought to interpret, and write, sarcasm with great ingenuity and wit if you wish to survive here(I dont like the comma here) on reddit.
Disk Utility in OS X to make the dmg, then I open the image in handbrake and let her rip with whatever settings I feel are appropriate.
hmmm, but is it worth it?
ARTICLE DOWNVOTED FOR USING ALL CAPS IN TITLE.
Zero 7 - The Pageant of the Bizarre
When the MPAA accepts piracy, the public will accept piracy, and all of your vaunted word of mouth will go towards motivating these friends, etc. to go *download* the movie themselves.  It works fine with a minority of pirates (which is the status quo), and I understand you cannot prevent piracy, but I'm all for prosecutions that keep the general public from adopting an unsustainable habit.
No comments, either.
Very nicely done article.  I've personally never much liked Craigslist.  It is like Usenet on the web but with less freedom and less organization.  I find is absolutely impossible to believe that anyone finds romantic connections there.  I guess it makes sense as a free place to find an apartment.  But buying and selling things?  No way...way too much personal interaction required.
I'd love for my doctor to give me a script for naproxen...much cheaper (for me) than buying Aleve. 
The datasets make a good case for using nonparametric statistics.
I'm not familiar with the song, but judging from the lyrics, Devo was using the word to mean someone with Down Syndrome. Perhaps that's how **Tcrowaf** meant it. I guess it got this meaning because one of the characteristics of Down Syndrome is an epicanthic fold, which is shared by the group this word usually describes. Even if it didn't have extreme racial connotations, I don't think this is a word I'd close with. Given its more common meaning, using it was a big mistake.
I too, was an 80's child, and remember fondly attending a concert at the Halifax train station sponsored by Much. We were so excited to see Erica Ehm, Steve Anthony and Dan Gallagher. (I used to love Test Pattern!) Dan apparently passed away in 2001.   I find it very surreal that JD Roberts is now on CBS as their Chief Whitehouse Correspondent.
I thought that "reverse racism" is when a person is called a racist because of their skin color.
No, there aren't more racists in the south, just louder ones. 
&gt;...the problem is, eventually you run out of rugs... Nah, we have a contract with Chinese manufacturers for unlimited rugs.
What the fuck else is he gonna do?
Even all the moments of a distribution aren't enough.  So if you don't have a model to go with then yes you have to make some subjective choices about fitting data.
This was me too, without the psycho (that was a previous one).  I knew it was over 5-6 months before I ended it.  I wasn't really interested in being with her anymore, but knew she'd take it rough.  I took her v-card. I genuinely didn't want to hurt her.  The breakup was tough, but she handled it better than I thought.
My suggestion would be to purchase a bong first, later on get a vaporizer adapter for it (i believe RooR makes those) and hit the vape through the bong.  Some things to consider:  *2 different types of high: I found bongs (of all brands and shapes) usually give me a KICK, or a very energetic high (at least up until the 5th rip), while a vaporizer gives me more of a food high, such as one a person might get after cooking the herb, still very energetic yet much more attentive and intelligent. (of course this also directly relates to the strand of your choice). *Upkeep/Cleaning: I'm always looking for new pieces and accessories for my bong... The more i have, the less times i have to clean it.  A vape on the other hand, stays clean for a longer time although still needs occasional cleaning. *burning the herb: do you like weed? or do you like THC? It is believed that the *full* affect of marijuana can only be achieved when the herb is smoked... keep that in mind when shopping for a vape.  Goodluck finding the right piece for you!
Ender's Game and Ender's Shadow (The Bean series) are both awesome books, but pretend the sequels never happened. Card writes an awesome YA novel with lots of action and fun characters then tries as hard as he can to make the next 4 books absolutely nothing like the first novel in the series. The 2nd Ender book takes place with Ender a grown man dicking around on a planet trying to "understand" little pig aliens. The 2nd Bean novel is all politics and might as well have taken place in the present day. 
If you *can* buy a house, why don't you? You've spent years throwing money at a landlord already. You want to keep throwing it away for why?
I actually like the original better, it gives the dock a "far off in the distance" look.  The original pic espouses feelings of solemness while the crop reminds me of Baywatch for some reason.  Don't ask why, because I don't know.
A long time ago, in a teen-age moment.  While being insulted to my face by a busty girl, for me being a flat girl.  "And I'll probably still be perky when I am 40...while yours will be reaching for the floor." The passage of time, it brings the best revenge for every A cup out there who's been made to feel less of a woman for it. 
Or, "Use of condoms helps to prevent unwanted pregnancy, as well as most sexually transmitted infections, including such presently uncurable infections like HIV and hepatitis"
&gt; I am sure by now that chap is dead and has realized that he randomly pissed off people in the last years of his life hoping to gain enough points with jesus - only to realize what a waste of time that was.  There's people, missionaries and stuff, that really feel just awful about all the hellbound heathens and try to rescue as many as they can.  In his twisted way, he was just trying to do you a solid.
Oh I'm so sorry. Acne related insults are the worst. When I was a teen I also had awful acne. It didn't help when my uncle asked me one day where I got the horrible rash on my face. When I told him it was acne he said "That's impossible- there's too many! It must be a rash." Then he started trying to push my bangs away to get a better look, and arguing with my dad about whether pimples could get that bad.  Out of curiosity, how did the accutane work out? Did it take long to work? 
Remember the Aristocats? In my mind you sounded like that.
One time someone made a snarky comment about me being ugly, before I retorted,   "What are you going to do for a face when the monkey wants its arse back?"  In my defence, I was like 11. It definitely felt great though, as even her friends started laughing at her.   Since then I've grown steadily lazier with my insults, and simply resort to using "so's your face" repeatedly regardless of what someone says. 
You sat there and watched them for hours? What were you doing?  edit: nevermind :\
Oh shit. I was a bit too stoned this morning.  Fuck yeah superman, take a few more :D
To be honest, I misremembered. IIRC, it did say "optional." Sorry for the incorrect information, downvote my earlier comment if you wish.
Fucking awesome review!
Barney Stinson?
She's awesome.
Hey! C'mon! What did I ever do to you?? I didn't deserve that! (but I kind of saw it coming and clicked it anyway, but **still**)
preachy tirade against upvoting on apathy subreddit
No, it really was my little sister. I was always a girly-girl.  When we all get together, we insist she tell the story so we can continue to enjoy a great laugh over it.  She's a much better story teller than I could ever hope to be and we go into hysterics when she demonstrates how she used to try to kiss her elbow.  
Because it deals with having a very personal paradigm shift.  Poster clearly feels there is a parallel between the Copernican turn and the shift from a theistic world view to an atheistic world view.  I say it stays.  &lt;&lt;places hands squarely on hips&gt;&gt; 
Damn. I prefer dickgirls.
Quakers are a relatively small group with tremendous theological diversity and practice; however, they have been on the cutting edge of social justice issues throughout their history.  Some types of Quakers are extremely progressive and theologically liberal.
The problem is how do you know which one is last? What if you kill what you thought were the last king and priest but it turns out they weren't the last? Then the next king will kill you and most probably the next priest will damn you to hell. That would be fucked up.
Alternately, is it bigoted to think less of an ethnic group for a tradition of theirs that you find silly?  Example:  Having a dinner party and being annoyed that you have to prepare a special meal for someone who won't eat certain foods because their ancestors didn't?
Ear Nose and Throat.
&gt;uhh,.. like skin color? So, in other words, there are no differences that matter to anyone but a fashion designer. Thank you.
I have actually been to England more than anywhere else; I don't know if you consider England to be Europe, but I guess I do.  But I have also been to Germany, France, Belgium, etc.  [Blue Laws](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Blue_law) restrict what you can do on Sunday.  I realize that Europe is not so religious anymore and they just keep the laws because some people like them.  But really, they are far more restrictive than anything I have ever seen in the U.S.  I would feel strange having the government tell me what I could or could not do on Sunday.
People's Court
Um, it's the exact same for women too.  Don't think that this is only with guys. It's because they're comfortable.  No one particularly better has come along, and while they're sick of having sex with that person, breaking up is just a pain in the ass. 
If this was Israel and they claimed the land must be purely Jewish, then there would be calls from rabid Redditors for its dissolution.   EDIT: downvoted for truth, I see.
What's the occasion? How much do you want to spend?  For a view of the harbour - in customs house - [Cafe Sydney](http://www.cafesydney.com). More expensive and you have to book but great food and awesome view for an occasion (make sure you get the balcony).  For cheaper places, I really like Newtown for Thai (Thai Riffic for a nice seating place or Doytao Thai for cheaper food).  Tony Romas near King Street Wharf is awesome for Ribs. Kinda like american food.  My favourite pizza/italian place is [Made in Italy](http://www.madeinitaly.com.au). I've never eaten at Pyrmont but I have at Wynyard. Wynyard is a takeaway place but the pizza was excellent.  Edit: Fixed link
&gt;What we need is a comprehensive, revenue-neutral overhaul of the U.S. tax code What we need is eliminating the income tax altogether and replacing it with a Value Added Tax.
I would've said something too if you were looking at her anything like you are [here.](http://www.sschicken.com/show/88-wed/images/CMa%200171.jpg)
No sex with a friend's ex.  It's in the Bro Code.
Agreed.  They're FanGirls. If you want a woman who is going to get all of your obscure Star Wars references and play video games with you, you're not going to get a super model! That's just the way life is.  They're probably all fairly smart and even if they're not classic beauties, this group has a LOT going for them in the body department compared to most gamer/geek chicks I know!
Ever seen a drive-by on ritalin dealers?
&gt; that all this "evil" that he talks about are just things to over come.  Sure. Let's overcome birth defects, airplane crashes, and Krackatoa. They're all just challenges, eh? Good lessons for how to die successfully?
"You say modern femenism is unnecessary? Not true! Let me tell you how it was in the '70s. See how terrible we have it?"  Does anyone see the flaw in this logic?
If you live out west you could apply for a job with either [Wyeast](http://www.wyeastlab.com) in Hood River, OR or at [White Labs](http://www.whitelabs.com/) in Boulder, CO.  I've toured Wyeast, and I agree that having access to all that lab equipment (not to mention all the free beer you can drink) would be pretty sweet.
she's so cute :3
I read a fuckton of a lot.  I always have, I used to ride my bike to the library and get out 8 books a week.  The limit was 5 at once but they got to know me and let me exceed that.  The more you read, the faster you get.  I see a whole word or multiple words as a group - like a picture, not reading a single word sounding it out one at a time.
Crap, now I'm really hungry.
Only far-left liberals think it was misguided, he was afraid, he was a pussy and a murderer who only cared about his agenda.  He did not think of the potential threat to the people of the U.S. and certainly not about the people of Iraq or any surrounding countries who could of potentially been attacked by them.  He has brought shame to the Kennedy name, especially because his brothers were war heroes.
*tear*  I feel like the red man who stands on the edge of a cliff looking as the white man destroys my forest. 
Government is a secular god, they run from religion and cling to the state.
*vomits*
Caption contest!
To add to the garlic peeling tips: pressing the clove tightly while twisting it slightly will also loosen the peel making it easy to take off.
19/20, missed bloody Turkey. Surprised Vietnam and Indonesia made the list, and that Australia didn't.
I agree - Video on Trial is the only show they have worth watching.
This is the way a lot of businesses work - 80% of people won't protest. Whether it is an auto-rejected health care claim (my apologies if it seems I'm seizing a political goat - I'm actually citing Grisham's Rainmaker, Erin Brokovich, and any number of other movies which are obviously Real Life), or "Hey, here's a bill for $money we didn't discuss earlier." The whole premise of predatory lending, for that matter, and overdraft fees from rearranged deposits...
A guy I know to one of our bodybuilding friends: You know that's all going to turn to fat someday. The bodybuilding friend (with mock awe): Dude, you must have been *huuuge*!
&gt;Save your cheese rinds for making broths, soups, or as a flavor enhancer in a sauce. I keep mine in the freezer.  I had never thought of this. Will be tried soon!
Boo hoo, now we won't get to indiscriminately kill people at a low cost!
I'm a working software/electrical/embedded engineer, I see Linux as an engineering tool.   It doesn't get in my way, I have the "schematics", I can tweak it, and it allows me low level access to anything I want to do.  It's not a religious reason, it's practical.  I run VMware so I can have Windows XP for all the other nice things it offers like a consistent drag and drop interface, and I prefer its file explorer style. It also works a lot better out of the box as I hate having to set up really obvious stuff like image viewers.
&lt;ooc&gt;  Show evidence.  &lt;/ooc&gt;
I don't always do it, but my boyfriend says his father advises against it in case some person is tooling through the lot willy-nilly and hits you, they won't take out your engine.  I try not to do it in lots with directional rows.  It's a pain to go the wrong way, and even more a pain to try to go the right way.
What would you accept as proof of God?  We have a written ancient record chronicling Jesus' life on earth.  We have billions of people who have felt God's presence and have had their life changed by it.  What would *you* accept as "proof"?  You can't prove that love exists.  You can't put love in a test tube and measure it.  If you believe there is such a thing as love, you accept it on faith.  You are right to do so.  What is so different about God?
When I was about 13 years old a classmate gave my older sister two 3.5" disks with programming tasks for her college, but those disks had bad sectors and some files could not be read. I tried to recover them with Norton Utilities for DOS and I failed, but instead I unerased two .txt files which appeared to be very interesting sexual educating texts. One was something by Angel Smith (I could not find it on google now), advices from hookers to women to help them make their husbands sexually happier, another one was on the same topic. With a lot of details. Before reading that book I barely imagined how things work, after - I could answer any theoretical question from my friends.
Whine whine whine. Obvious troll is obvious. Whine whine whine.  Only Nazis invoke Godwin's Law!
I would say both god and government are imaginary institutions.
The last time I tried, loading/saving the document in ColorSync would do the trick.
You can learn to draw like that. I see better drawings than this from high school kids. It just takes practice, a good teacher, and it helps if you like to do it a lot.
I'd say it's more to do with lack of fuel than the distance
Actually, it was satire.
They sound like that [turtle humping a sneaker.](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=lJwf2jAmnD0)
I hate when that happens...
exactly..and thats why the cop told the guy to put the sign down. because he was slandering, k done.
Or, "Use of condoms helps to prevent unwanted pregnancy, as well as most sexually transmitted infections, including presently uncurable infections such as HIV and hepatitis.  Condoms do not prevent the transmission of herpes, genital warts, HPV and pubic lice.  Therefore, condoms should not be used as a carte blanche to engage in sexual relations with just anybody"
Thank you for helping my recovery.
You're in California.  Go to a nearby Spanish Mission and ask how many times it's been rebuilt because of earthquakes.  Buildings that are just a few decades old often have quake damage to the foundation.  We have to replace or upgrade buildings to new building standards regardless because of the danger.  Though our metal, plaster and wood buildings must be replaced and lack the 'charm' some are looking for, they won't kill you in the meantime.
We have administrators down town (central office) who send out mass emails...sometimes up to 10 a day. I started just replying to them "Thank you".  I encouraged all my friends to do the same. I got yelled at eventually.
He was technically correct in following your instructions. Common sense is a different story. 
&gt; it is us that creates the suffering on this world because of our free will  Whose free will creates cancer, plane crashes, and earthquakes?
;)
domain'd
Ah, see, now there's a quality film. Disney before Disney sucked.
Is it?  Russia is not in any way an ideal country, but I find the typical American view of Russia and Putin laughable.
I'm struggling to see the relevance. Is Lynda Carter in the Chewbacca suit?
"quick, someone call kevin bacon!"
Agreed; the colours in each image portray different mental images of the context.  Blue = cool, crisp : Green = futuristic toxic waste catastrophe?
dan savage is fabulous, in so many senses of the word.
yes niceguy, this is what i do. it's handy. freezing garlic? bullshit
Abortion is not murder, that is the law of the land.  Murder is not some vague term you can just use to mean what you want, it is a legal word and has an actual meaning and abortion does not qualify.
It isn't that sad, I mean they kept a link to the old site and that's a lot more than you can ask for IMHO. 
also -I suppose your "feet" could be "fils" meaning son -so "fils de putain" would be 'son of a bitch'
* Open. There's nothing hidden to you; if you want to know how something works, you can, at any level. It doesn't mean it's _easy_ to do it, but nobody's stopping you.  * Free. No activations, no cracks, no costly upgrades. When you need something, you download it; when you need the new version, you download it.  * Customizable. A linux distro can be anything you want it to be. And you can set up all the smallest details; you decide what you need.  * Robust and reliable. When something breaks, you can easily identify what's wrong, and fix it with your hands. No binary registry, no cryptic codes, no obfuscation. It's all under the sun.  * (Perhaps the most important for me): Control. With linux, I'm in charge. I get to know and decide what my computer does, how and when. Being in charge isn't always easy, with great power comes great responsibility. But ultimately, freedom is worth it.
I agree. But I bought anyway. You can get indignant and stamp your little feet all day long, but in the end, NOBODY is going to say "fuck the system, let's let everything crash and see where the chips fall." Most Americans, and by our insane leveraging, most people in the world, would be financially RUINED by it. And not just the retarded 0% down, interest-only loaned "owners". People who bought in 1997 and saved up their 20% would be ruined.   Life isn't fair. And you also see that there is, in fact, an artificial bottom on the losses your investment can take. Nobody is going to let it crash that badly (or if it does, we're going to have bigger problems). You're really talking about the complete collapse of the American economy to get "what's fair", and as you see, there are quite a few people making sure that doesn't happen. If it does happen, you'll have bigger problems to worry about. If not, you're missing a fantastic buying opportunity. Either way, if inflation really kicks in, your house will "drop" in value as long as your salary can at least pace inflation, making it more affordable. So if you have the money and the ability to buy now, but are just crying that "it's not fair!!," you're only screwing yourself over here. 
Yes it is.
&gt;My cousin is one of the biggest assholes I know. He's a great guy  Does not compute.
Anyone else start laughing when they read the title? It was just so wonderfully surreal.
i use my stems for tea.
I'm an angry gorilla. I heard you needed me.
what's "cajones"?
Thanks, great blog post.
Thank you.  A lot.  Just a little confidence boost like that helps.   Have a great rest of the day. 
heh I have many talents. I'll be the first to admit I'm an idiot when it comes to cameras.
It's a UU church, which is kinda like agnostics who want their kids to go to sunday school.
next post:  I smashed my gf with a laptop (eat compaq ho!),  She still boots up, but most of her face is gone.  how can i get my dick out of the hottie?
&gt;Random Customer at her Bridal Shop.  I think you mean "Customer at her Bridal Shop".
Definitely - they're so frustrating!  Like why should I be penalized and have to barely shuffle along just because someone else is an idiot and can't learn to at least walk along the right side so you can pass them.  And people with baby carriages drive me nuts too. 
How, er, symbolic!
Hahaha, now I _did_ laugh out loud to that. Thanks :D
Does anyone else this looks like Kate and John Locke?
&gt; All matter above 0 kelvin release some photons, just not enough for us to see  The biggest problem isn't that there isn't enough to see, it's that it's not in a visible wavelength.  [More](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Blackbody)
Make a flowchart that has one question "Should I have sex with this child who is a student at my school?" It should lead directly to a box that says "No"
Get out of my head! &lt;&lt;Grabs ears and runs away&gt;&gt;
Tabernac !
HOLY CRAPSHITS!  A FOUNDATION?  FUCK-A-DUCK!  TELL ME ABOUT THE WAINSCOTING!
2856  *3423
This whole "men are objectively ugly" thing is a crock, and I'm fairly sure it's an attempt to make y'all as neurotic as women so The Man can sell more hair gel and striped button-down shirts.  There are certainly homely folks in this world, which is (a) crap luck, (b) an external warning about shoddy genetic code beneath, or (c) the result of poor personal care.  Move along, move along.  There are also plenty of genetically blessed men in this world.  Ripped men, normal men, chunky-style men.  Men, men, men.  There's not a day I wake up that I wouldn't like one naked in my bed.  To answer the original question: Yes, I sit around in my underwear and yes, I absentmindedly adjust the girls.
Wizard sleeve.
Was your roommate [Winston Churchill](http://www.brainyquote.com/quotes/quotes/w/winstonchu108948.html) by any chance?
Moar? http://farshores.org/scole.htm
Went to Australia. 
No mainstream historian supports that view as starting the war of 1812. Citation please.
yes, but i dont have the money to do that... or the money to have my site the way i want... the douche that runs it now hasnt made the necessary changes to it in a year! i dont have the money to start a new one at the moment... but someday i hope to...
tough crowd! I can think of better options.
Every time I would go to one I would think of the guy just going  bit to far and braking my neck :/ now I don't go to a chiropractor any more.
I greatly preferred *As I Lay Dying*.
"It isn't hot until the cats run through the lawn spray to cool down."
actually I have, I'm married, and if one person lost their date we would have just left them where they were and let them eat with the others at their table
Always classy to rip off Churchill
I've never cared what random people say.  I would only care if it were someone I thought highly of.
It's etymology dates back to 1707, where it was the ablative case of "res."  (such as 'in re,' which you still see used in some legal documents today). It meant 'regarding.'  The reason we started using it for email was because some bright programmer, whose name was lost to time, realized that when replying to an email it would be quick, organized, and simple to just insert an "RE:" at the beginning of a replied email's subject line. 
Hey. I've been in a similar situation, minus living with the guy. It sucks, but it'll be all right.  The problem with "friends with benefits" is it only works if there's no emotional attachment. There's nothing about it being exclusive and as far as I'm concerned, being sexually exclusive is something that separates relationships from flings.  That said, I agree with everyone else, sounds like you have feelings for him. Tricksy. You're gonna have to get over him; what works for me is being as harsh to yourself about it as possible, so cut out any "what ifs" and "maybes", ie. "Maybe he secretly has feelings for me, too?" No. He doesn't. It's just sex, for him at least. It hurts, and I'm sorry, but it's also relatively fast.  You're going to want to lay down some boundaries, too; for starters, no more sex. And if he sees other people and you don't want to hear about it, let him know that, too. It sounds like you have a really good friendship and I'm sure he'll want things to be as normal as possible, too. And whenever you're ready, go out and find someone that'll want to exclusively sleep with you, too. :)
I don't like the part of your idea where you don't beat the child.   When my dog takes a shit inside the house, I rub his nose in it.  When my kid puts a lock on his door, I ram his face in it.  Lesson learned.
And remember:  that was the same time The Right dragged out Paula Jones (her sexual harassment charges were later thrown out by a judge). Perfectly-timed to sway public opinion in favor of the GOP and to deflect attention away from the importance of Clinton's healthcare plans.    The American ruling class and the corporate oligarchs will always find a way to maintain the status quo.  Assassination, smear or the old standby-  brainwash the prols to do their dirty work for them (like they're doing tight now with these anti-healthcare plan dupes).  Mainstream news refuses to allow people to connect the dots and expose this pattern of deception, deflection and manipulation.   (I sounded like Jackie Chiles at the end there.. )
The Big Lebowski
Hey, they sent it to me free of charge. I'm simply thanking them.
How original.
If you have a PS2, and both games already, why buy a new console just to play those two games?  Pretty sure you could score a used PS2 and both games for &lt; $100
Ah, cool. Yeah, that's pretty standard over here too. Lots of venues have minimum insurance levels for liability for performers or contractors coming into their space (I work in concert/event production). Luckily that is paid for by the companies I work for. Also, employers are required to pay for medical treatment for their employees due to work related incidents, so they have insurance for that.  Basically, I have my own insurance, my own car insurance, whatever company I'm working for's liability insurance, workman's comp insurance, and car insurance (I freelance hence multiple companies). What a mess.
Thank you.
my thoughts exactly, sir... my thoughts exactly.
Exactly, and it was so repetitive. They've could have easily packed in a few more fact based arguments, instead of focusing on the "hot chick" (which was a downer the whole season, too many titties).
But the idea that the government can force you to praise *anything*... And to see footage of people in Nazi Germany and the absolute reverence they have for their flag and their symbols.  I don't like having to pledge to the flag simply for the awkward position it puts people in: "Act in great admiration of this object, or we will shun you socially." :-/
"My real name is Thrushfyre, but those who truly know me call me Mr. McKendrick."  He didn't usually identify himself as human to mundanes, but he sensed a human identity lurking within her as well.  Perhaps she, too, contained the spirit that allowed humans to spread throughout the world, mold the landscape itself beyond the dreams of the mightiest beaver, and build fantastical machines that allowed them to overcome the limitations of their comparatively frail bodies.  He could tell by the way she tried to hide her genitalia when she walked.
Some guy just looked at me and said "I hate you" at the 7th Ave entrance to Penn Station.  I said "but I like *you*!"  p.s.  Don't go to Boston.  I guess it's cool if you're in your 20's.
She just meant to say unique. 
Nuke all the pedobears! Let the devil sort 'em out! ;]
*sigh* spinlock says: &gt; So it sounds like you **don't** believe we would have entered a depression if Bernanke hadn't been so aggressive. I disagree.  willtron says: &gt;That statement clearly shows I **do** believe we would have entered a depression. What Bernanke did is just *postpone* that depression.  Again, did you even read what I wrote? We believe the exact same thing. I just believe he temporarily averted the depression and that it will be bigger in the future, as opposed to if he had just let it happen now.
Alright, how the fuck did you put alt-text on that link? Reveal your secrets!
Bigger, better (probably way more expensive) but available now!  http://www.goldfeverprospecting.com/keenevacuum.html
my wife's brother is a huge wise-ass.  he calls, wanting advice on how to make his wife conceive a boy. for some reason he calls me, thinking maybe about his two nephews.  **him** "is it true that if i fuck doggy-style that'll make a boy?"  **me** "yes. your sister had two boys, didn't she?"  **him** &lt;click&gt;
[good point!](http://www.irregularwebcomic.net/1851.html)
During an argument I was having with my friend a number of years back, I shouted at him, "Oh yeah? Well, at least I wasn't an accident".   He grew up with his mom. He didn't know his dad. If you take his birthday, and minus away nine months, the date is 24th December. Christmas party out of hand? You get the idea. 
Hey you could always sell the good kidney.
I'm Mexican..  Since I live so close the border and am pretty light-skinned I always get: "pinche guerro" (fucking cracker).   :(. Let's trade.
Ok, so not exactly hurtful, just kind of inappropriate and completely unnecessary...  I went to the shop to pick up some snack food, that was the sole intention of my going there.  I already had proper food to eat, but as I knew I was getting high (was slightly already, in fact) I picked up a multipack of crisps (or potato chips for you lot across the pond) and some chocolate and that was pretty much it.  I actually considered getting some fruit or something so it didn't look so bad but I thought fuck it, I know what I came for and that's all I'm leaving with, fuck what the person at the checkout thinks.  So I was queueing up when some guy behind me says to me, at a reasonable volume so all the people behind him can hear, "nice dinner you've got there".  So I said to him "yeah, right", feeling the rage rise up inside me.  Now, can anyone tell me what the fuck he had to gain from saying that?  Was he just trying to lord over me by letting me know how healthy he was or what?  How was it any of his fucking business?  What difference did it make to him?  I kinda wish I had come back with a witty reply, like "nice face you've got there" (he had a bottom lip piercing which strangely I find attractive on women, but it makes most men look like complete wankers to me, but even without it he had the face of a first rate cocksticle).  Anyway, his cuntishness was confirmed when on my way out I heard him say to the girl behind the counter, "smile! You always look so miserable when I come in here".  Complete and utter smeghead.  That is all.
Yep, like clockwork.  Within 10 seconds of facing the sun, I'll sneeze.  Or coming out of a dark building into a bright day.  I always joke that I'm allergic to sunlight. 
tl;dr version: obsessive realism detracts from storytelling. 
Don't mind me, I'm just whoring for karma. I didn't know there was a "forensic anthropology" and I can't even imagine what it means so I can't really ask you a question. 
Whatever happened to that Ron Paul reddit interview?  Has anyone seen it?
Yep, it's very neat. [Here's](http://math.ucr.edu/home/baez/week257.html) a bit more about it - you have to scroll down a way before you get to the bit about monads, though.
He was actually addressing that statement towards Robin
That must be a PC.
Finally! I hated that thing. I hope schools take a look at this.
Oh please!  It shows ***no such thing***.  That's simply the building supports breaking loose.  And, in case you don't know anything about demolition (and from the fact that you think the right side of the building shows proof of demolition, it's pretty obvious that you don't), if you want to demolish a building into its own footprint, you *wouldn't* run explosives up the exterior sections on each floor, the explosives would be cutting the supports in the basement instead...
I hope they continue to move in this direction. I really have no interest in vacationing anywhere that is less free than where I live, and I'm considering vacations in the region for the first time ever if drugs become easy and safe to obtain. Amsterdam is like 12 hours away by plane, Mexico four.
Brilliant. Excellent. 
I seriously had nothing in mind when I took this, I was experimenting with my camera's Shutter Priority mode. I suppose the main idea was basically the beach in general. I like how it turned out, to be honest though, thanks so much for your help.
Are you stupid? Do you not understand what kind of physical cabling it would take to provide super-high speed internet access to all US citizens?  You don't just start up your computer and tell it "Okay, make the internet work really fast!". We're probably talking millions of miles of cabling if we would intend to reach all citizens with high-speed access.  There are parts of the country that haven't even been wired for cable internet yet. 
Thanks for the PR, man. Upvote.
try and send me a virus, seriously, I'll open it ... even try to run it   after using linux for 6 weeks it'll boot up in the exact same amount of time  if I need to use windows I can run it in a virtual machine
I came up with the same thing, we should hang out.
You were CHOSEN!
So the wheelchair is basically a get away with being a douche free card? The original comment was neither funny nor witty, so I don't see why the comeback should be.
Nothing beats swapping the 'N' and 'M' keys on a keyboard. 
ugh: that picture.  Here:  &gt;ART. 11.  As the Government of the United States of America is not, in any sense, founded on the Christian religion; as it has in itself no character of enmity against the laws, religion, or tranquillity, of Mussulmen; and, as the said States never entered into any war, or act of hostility against any Mahometan nation, it is declared by the parties, that no pretext, arrising from religious opinions, shall ever produce an interruption of the harmony existing between the two countries.
Get that in writing ASAP. I'd get my own account for internet if I were you. And unless you're taking the modem with you that's not yours so you can't be charged for it. Get copies of the bill, don't take no for an answer. In my state even a verbal rental contract has certain rights attached to it, look up the landlord tenant laws in your area.
&gt; Yes, all of the discoveries made are based off of experimentation and testing to see how and why it works the way it does. Obviously this statement won't hold much weight, but this is why Scientologists believe our religion is based of off science.  But this is only part of science. Science is not a "one shot" deal. It does not begin and and with a single researcher.  It is an ongoing process of continuous improvement and advancement. SCientology, by contrast, is pretty much done in terms of how far it will advance. L. Ron Hubbard is dead. And Scientologists are not allowed to alter the Tech. This is not how science works.   Can you imagine a physicist who studied physics for decades and never once came up with anything new or disproved old theories? He'd be deemed a failure. Scientology is based on science in name only.   &gt; In order to become an auditor, one studies the e-meter very thoroughly and learns exactly what it is measuring and how it does so.  You may be surpised to know that the e-meter was actually in use by psychologists and psychoanalysts long before L. Ron Hubbard was even born. And it was abandoned as being too crude to to be of much use. While it is true that you can detect emotional reactions using the device, there is little else that can be accurately determined beyond that. Whatever you think it is detecting is more certainly just a rough estimation of what is actually going on.   The way the e-meter is used by Scientology is particularly problematic bacause they have the user grip the electrodes. So you're not only measuring GSR, but also minute fluctuation in the subject's grip. It is kind of like using a high powered telescope by holding it with your hands (no base).  
freshly showered poontang
[Milk?](http://articles.mercola.com/ImageServer/public/2007/07--july/7.5milk.jpg)
not bad :)
Oh definitely. I have been programming on and off since I was 16. I only wished I had picked up *nix sooner. :( Never the less, I will die a programmer.
Very true.  There's a good Penn &amp; Teller about environmentalism that tracks the parallel between carbon credits and Catholic indulgences during the Middle Ages and Renaissance.
I'm waiting for the REALLY clever ads before I decide to buy condoms. 
...and -- done!  I'm gonna make sure this gets noticed around UW-Madison. This bill could be huge
My wife thinks she knows everything. Maybe she should write for them? ;)
OK, and?  There are plenty of white guys with large noses and\or lips.  Just look at F. Murray Abraham.  Ditto curly hair. Those are trivial bits of physical construction.  
I agree, no need to go all PC over everything.  If a kid is being a little prick then call the little prick a little prick. repeat as needed for alternative phrases...
I'm not so sure that graphs should ever substitute for an understanding of statistics.  If one understands statistics deeply enough then there is no need to ever see a graph to make valuable inferences.  There IS a reason that normality isn't assumed.
Just because a person is incapable of using a language correctly (although the definition of correctly can be disputed) does not mean the language itself is crippled.
Have you met P-Dub?
Upvoted for better reading material than the shit at the top
I believe in pooping shit.
Spelling: It still works the same way regardless of your major.
Selbst die Gutmenschen und Grüne-Wähler, die vehement für Multi-Kulti sind, verlassen bei ihren eigenen Kindern lieber die Stadt als sie auf eine Migrantenschule zu schicken. Wie beschreibend. You reap what you sow, 68er.
[Oh, indeed it does.](http://www.reddit.com/r/offbeat/comments/9fwmr/durex_ads_so_clever_they_almost_make_you_want_to/c0cmcud)
What's this idiotic notion that netbooks can only be used to access the internet? Mine's hooked to a 26" monitor and I develop software with it. EDIT: When it was running XP and had a virus and spyware scanner, it *was* pretty slow, but that's easily fixed. I just don't understand why I should use a computer in a particular way because of some marketing jerk.
Of course! I usually squeeze my large breasts and rub my nipples till they become hard. Then with my other hand I touch my penis.
You guys are both pie in the sky dreamers. I like it, but we need something more practical.  I propose we allow the mole people to pluck a certain percentage of our rutebegas in exchange for right of way in their underground tunnels. 
Again, it is completely understandable that she is insecure and jealous about this camping trip, but if she honestly will not listen to you at all and not try to compromise/communicate, you definitely shouldn't leave your best friend for an already unstable relationship. If you can approach her rational enough and empathetic enough to make her feel trusting and secure toward you, she may be understanding, but if she will definitely not listen to you then the relationship itself might not even be worth it...Unless you think you can provide an alternative with this camping trip (bring her along, bringing along another friend(s), or not even going at all)
A protein-rich, healthy smoothie is a great way to start the day; this smoothie will make you feel like you can lift buildings. 
wild turkey. get whiskey drunk.
&gt; my Dad wasn't Jewish ... but HIS mother was  Sorry dude, your dad was Jewish.  He might not have been a believing or practicing Jew, but he could have gotten an Israeli citizenship.
that would only work if the image was hotlinked, which it isn't
Harper is not a billionaire and he is the head of Canada's right wing party.  Seriously. Please pay attention. 
Frankenstein's monster. FTFY. 
You know, thats all not my taste, but its still cool.
I am in almost exactly the same boat as you are.
Yeah, this is my favorite as well. I was thinking (and thus posed the question), because my local library is closed for a week due to budget cuts.   Otherwise, yes, I agree
This is a short story, but you should really read "Where Are You Going, Where Have You Been?" by Joyce Carol Oates. And anything by Flannery O'Connor.
It's exactly the same thing. Great point.
For once in my life I come up with a funny witty line, and someone has to assume it was taken from Reader's Digest!
The part about him getting booed by an audience in Waco, TX, for saying the moon reflects light from the sun?  http://www.thinkatheist.com/profiles/blogs/bill-nye-bood-in-texas-for  (The link at the bottom of that article *does* work:)  http://www.wacotrib.com/news/content/news/stories/2006/04/06/04062006wacbillnye.html
&gt;MAME - Multiple Arcade Machine Emulator  He's right!
Clicca questo link per guadagnare facilmente con Twitter in autopilot e' GRATIS
Who are some of your bands influences and who are your All-Time Top 3 Bass players?
hehe that was funny.
That's completely true.  I think the core issue remains the same, though.  Whether the atheist community in Hinduism is larger or smaller, older or newer, is kind of immaterial in my opinion.  Of course, you are free to disagree.  The further away from the popular religious core this stream of Hinduism gets and the more firmly established it gets, the less reason one needs to actually cite it with atheism.  At some point, it becomes nothing more than a philosophy, and you don't see many people wandering around saying they are "zen atheists" or "sophist atheists" or "buddhist atheists", even if they might all be technically possible or even popular.  Implied in the philosophy is atheism because the philosophy doesn't deal with divinity in any fashion.  The terms become redundant.
That's next month's trip courtesy of FutureJohnSteiner
I've stopped peeling carrots altogether.  I just give 'em a good scrub in the sink.
don't forget hair
OK. So what is your price range?
haha yeah.  At one point in my life I had long hair and a goatee.  I was out eating with my girlfriend and the waitress, when approaching from behind me, referred to us as "two ladies".  She was pretty embarrassed when she saw my face.
Nah.
I too am surprised at how National seems to be riding a wave of popularity. They have made quite a few blunders, and for some reason, Labour hasn't been able to capitalise on those. For what it's worth though, I voted for Key and I think the 90-day trial period for employees is a good idea. People are all up in arms about it, because at first blush it sounds like it's hurting those it's designed to help. Say you're a solo mum who's been out of the workforce for a long time. Or someone who has spent some time in prison, but looking to get on the right path. Or a teenager looking for his first job. An employer is going to be wary about hiring you, because NZ laws make it very difficult to fire people. So naturally, they're going to opt for a "safer" option and be cautious about taking on these "risky" employees. The option of letting these people go later down the line allows employers to take these people on, at a lower risk. If the employee turns out to be a good worker, then they'll likely be offered a longer contract at the end of 90 days. Even if they aren't offered further work, they come away with three months worth of experience and a reference they otherwise wouldn't have had, given their background. The trial period acts as a way of "filtering" out the good workers from the not-so-good in the absense of relevant work experience or other clues as to the worker's competence. The same reasoning can be used to back a slightly lower wage for youth. If you're a greater risk to hire, then an employer will not hire you unless he is paying you less. 
I thought putain was more like "whore".
Just like most people are not totally repulsed by people of other races, but they're not really attracted to them, it's a gradient.
Very funny.
k
What are your feelings about the men/women who work in IA?
No no no, Marvel's doing just *fine* [fucking up Deadpool on their own](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=aCTDVNgNUeY)
Harris hawk. Kills camera. Oh bugger.
Pat Robertson is evil. The world would be better off without him.
fuck you, obviously fake.  Post a link or otherwise you'd be contacting authorities instead of posting to reddit.  
Originally credited to Winston Churchill.
I have a sick dominix setup with shadow serp gear, I picked the incursus because it looks like a narwhal :)
Davis?
that wasn't nice.
I believe the following:  a) They (violent dictators) are responsible for the atrocities they've committed  b) The reason(s) *why* they are a violent dictator can likely be traced to the treatement they receive at the hands of others, i.e. they are a product of a dysfunctional society  The same way that a regular ol' murderer in North America is likely a product of poor parenting, a chemical imbalance, or something similar, while poor parenting and chemical imbalances are not taken to trial for murder.  For the record, I didn't downvote you this time.
 which version? With kde 4.2.4 all programs are dsplayed on which desktop it has  lunched. (on Pardus Linux 2009)
Damn, you're right. I forgot about the scenario generator. I never use it much so I don't know if it's good at creating viable maps. There are lots of user-created maps and mods though. Check out [AoW II Heaven](http://aow2.heavengames.com/). I don't know that I'd recommend the unofficial 1.4 patch though.
I agree with you, now that I see it slightly more neutral on the blues. Thanks. 
i'm not 100% sure, but my guess is that currently, it's nasa going and they bid out to boeing/etc to help make it happen. the new method would be for us to buy space on launches that are already planned by the private sector.  can anyone confirm/deny/elaborate/etc?
No he was killed by a socialist
People, help me out here . . . .  Especially since the market crash, I simply do not see the point in buying property as a normal middle class man.  If I own a property, it will take me 40 years to pay it off.  I am 28 so by that time I will be dead soon.  In addition to paying the mortgage, I will have to pay property tax, as well as HOA.  I will also need to repair anything that breaks.  If I rent: no HOA, no tax, and if it breaks, most of the time they fix it.  It seems that the value of real estate does not alway increase, not only because of the market collapse, but also because of inflation.  I have not done any real research, just my observation.  Seems like houses are nothing more than an anchor or a slave chain.  I really want someone to explain how I am wrong so I can justify buying a house.  Help me out here folks.
You're the stalker from the comic book post!   I'm watching you...
Could you imagine doing this in any other situation and getting away with it?  Telling your boss you won't work a co-worker because you prefer to work with white people? Walking into a bank and asking for a different teller because you prefer to make your deposit with a white person? Asking if you can change classes because you prefer to be taught by a white person? 
This made my day, and I thought I would share.
Bits &amp; Bytes was a Canadian show about computers in the early 80's. It's quite interesting what their attitude towards licenses/copyright was. 
Hell, I've downloaded the thing...and I'm on linux.
good pay back for all the bogus brit judges giving away matches by decision.
Nice. I wonder what items were from your design. I work in China and we manufacture promotional gift items (especially if made by plastic) and child car seats for exports.  In response to the OP, you are correct, there are costs that are just more cost-effective (and future loss prevention) if done in the US/elsewhere. Especially when it comes to meeting certain standards such as UL, CS, but most of all, usability and consumer friendly. Chinese design are just a tad non-detailed enough or don't consider enough to be a major difference from Western design. And not to mention the local mantra, "no need for perfection; just needs to be working."  But on the other side of the coin, there are so many items I see, that I don't think USA would want to make. Styrofoam cups, straws, forks, china plates, low value low design everyday consumer items, and these are plentiful. There should be a better allocation of resources away from these items and into high value items given the living standards / costs in the US. So as a response to the OP, there is really no need to worry about China's stronghold ON THESE manufactured items.  mailinator1138 though, you are correct in your creator / parasite comment. In China nowadays, because of the bad 1st quarter, most manufacturing won't make a good profit compared to 2007 when the whole year was in a party-mood. This year, because of the rally in the stock market, people have been using what finances they have and put into the stocks, getting much better returns on money so far. (note I didn't use capital because, quite frankly, most of the money used are probably loans / credits instead of real capital.)  And this is exactly your parasite description. And this is a path I'm afraid China will follow the US.   Instead of keep on innovating and creating values through design and inventions, more and more capital and focus and energies are put into finance.   Finance uses excess capital from old-school value creation (profit), but people treat further finance as value creation. I see it more as bubble creation, as additional value in finance is created by leveraging. But when new capital is provided due to profits from value creation, that is really an expansion of wealth.   Anyway, it is much easier to "do" than "think and create", but hopefully for all countries' sake, the market force / attraction of profit / moral urgency is still powerful enough a lure for people to get out of the DO mode and into the CREATING mode. 
It's also important to remember that many people's life savings have been invested into their house. Whether the pain they would suffer is worth propping up the market is debatable, but I don't think they should be forgotten.
Golly, some people are so dumb! 
Some favorites, because I can't really pick one:  *Morbid Angel - Blessed Are the Sick *Immolation - Dawn of Possession *Necrophobic - the Nocturnal Silence *Celtic Frost - To Mega Therion *Asphyx - the Rack *Emperor - In the Nightside Eclipse *Burzum - Burzum / Aske *Slayer - Show No Mercy
I show it to my brother and he says "what year is that?"  
Yeah, it was a joke to begin with. Or a troll. Maybe both.
Did it die in the service of Project Mayham?
To this I would add avoiding computer screens and TVs right before bed. Shutting it off and reading a book or magazine in the 20 minutes or so prior to when you'd like to fall asleep helps.  Also, get some exercise during the day.  And as per your problem waking up a little to early, you might try getting up and going to the bathroom or something. I find that getting up for a minute or two sort of re-prepares me for getting back in bed. You might also be psyching yourself out after it keeps happening. Happens to me every time I have a morning flight that I get horrible sleep the night before.
For Great Justice.
I think none of these women are bad looking... you fags are suffering from too-much-porn syndrome where you get too choosy if you know what I mean.
My girlfriend at the time walked right into hers.  We were with a friend and she was bitching about her elbow hurting or something similar.  This was a regular occurrence for her and pretty damn annoying.  It was never anything serious, she just liked to complain I guess.  Her: My elbow is really sore.  Me: You know I never have anything aching on me, I must be really lucky I guess.  Her: Either that or you just don't complain about it.  Me: My point exactly.  At this point our friend cracks up laughing and even my gf had to admit that it was pretty funny.
Thank you!
yeah god, what made that guy think of the toilet as the first place people might have sex in a restroom.
I have had panic attacks and anxiety after smoking pot.  Xanax consistently evaporates all anxiety.
uhhhhhhhh.
I know it's supply and demand, luv. I'm decrying joseph because I get the feeling he's saying that it is not. I'm taking a cue from Caplan's *Myth of the Rational Voter,* where he writes that "the public’s implicit model of price determination is that businesses are monopolists of variable altruism. If a CEO feels greedy when he wakes up, he raises his price—or puts low-quality merchandise on the shelves. Nice guys charge fair prices for good products; greedy scoundrels gouge with impunity for junk."  And I totally agree with that last sentence, for the record.  We don't actually disagree on anything, you know.
The biggest benefit of recessions is that they serve as an enema for poorly conceived and poorly run businesses.  In boom times,  I've wasted my time at job interviews thinking "How the hell is this place even in business".    When I peek my head out next year to see what the market looks like,   I'm looking forward to seeing viable companies that have weathered a pretty strong downturn with the fly-by-night boom time crap already weeded out.
You should post links to both videos to /r/christianity. or urge him to do it.
Holy hell, I'd never heard of that before. Thanks man. This may well be the handiest debugging tool I have ever seen, heard of, or fantasized about existing.
Ge gone, foul beast, or I shall slay thee!
How original of you! I mean, him.
There are other sites that are more friendly and have better news. abovetopsecret.com is one, and you won't get all the fucking horny kids. Another one, and I know a lot of people will be surprised, is stormfront. Yeah, sure it makes out as a white supremecist kkk group, but did you know it's run by the adl? try posting this simple fact there, and see what happens.
Well, either pick up a kama sutra, or let me show you.  And with those words, she grabbed him by the pointed ear and dragged him to his quarters, doors shut tight, yet the sounds of inter-humanoid-species sex still managed to seep though.
It was her ex boyfriend, they made it look like an accident, there is a lot more to that story
and shes holding a HUGE dildo!
You wanna step outside tough-guy?
You might be the most dense person I've ever encountered.
Not when heroism overcomes a situation dire.
lol no it's not D: I want a new friend though
I'll answer your question for him with a question of my own.  Can you make him happy?
The two girls who I had been seeing simultaneously (each knowing full well about the other) confronted me and told me I had to choose which one I was going to commit to.  I snapped: "Are you kidding? If I cared at all about either of you do you think I'd be treating you like this?" One flinched like she'd been hit in the face, the other started screaming at me. Needless to say, they both kept seeing me for a few months afterwards. It's a strange state of affairs where people choose to live down to your disrespect for them.
Because I'm sure they didn't want to redraw everything, I bet than can get away with some of the original assets. Also because from across the room it's impossible to tell.
thats Australia lite thank you very much
Yep, they're they names of Harry Potter's nemesis and his nemesis's father. Pretty much ruined.
A fair number of the people I work with have them. It's mostly System and Network engineers that have to be on call alot though. It beats carrying around a $2,000 8 pound laptop just in case you get called and need to ssh into something.
What's up?
Shhh, he's flirting.
Thank fuck!  At least you don't have to pay the late-fees unless you're married.
I am waiting too. I sold in 2006. I am using this "hiatus period" to pay down the principle on my unsecured debt (credit cards). I think in a year I should have enough saved and enough debt reduced to use my VA Loan again with no down payment and buy another house. I made $89k off my first home purchase when I was 25 years old. Reality is that a home means more to me than having a bunch of expendable capital. Apartment living isn't for me.
.. frog?
I feel creepy looking people in the eye.
Downvoted for historical inaccuracy.
Ganguro girls FTW.
what?
I came here with the prediction, "the first comment will be in all caps, as will most of the following comments".  Way to not let me down, Reddit!  Here's an orange envelope and an upvote.
[Guess what is my new wallpaper.](http://imgur.com/In700.jpg)
I thought that roach clip looked familiar.
omg lol. 
 * There's no good hardware for Android (and I don't know about you but I wouldn't want to develop games in Java)  * Symbian hasn't got good touchscreen support, is pretty fragmented (S60 vs UIQ, all the different versions and feature packs etc) and is going away in favour of [Maemo](http://maemo.org/) anyway  * WinMo is still just not a good platform for a *phone* (it was a half-decent PDA platform about 5 years ago and just hasn't significantly progressed).  The Pre looks interesting, but is currently only available in America and AFAIK the WebOS SDK isn't well suited to writing games.  Maemo looks very interesting, but isn't available anywhere until October so we'll have to wait and see.  Blackberry barely qualifies as a smartphone OS, has all the problems of Android, and all the problems of Symbian, and then some; and with their "business-user" market segment I don't think anyone sees it as a platform for games.  That leaves ... just the iPhone.  I don't like it, but it does seem like the best mobile-phone games platform out there at the moment.
I took some alone time like you suggested and I did indeed work it out:  I laughed because I found it funny.
Please, go ahead.
Shit, doesn't everyone do that though?  That's more of a lookism thing... you know, where good looking people get all the perks.  It's ironic!
I think i would give up my ability to juggle for the ability to draw.   I have so much stuff in my head I wish i could draw to share with people.  I feel like a poet who can't write or speak.
Oooh Durango you're right. I'm horrible with vehicle names.  
**New Jersey Douches in a car**: Nice shorts, fag-ball!  **Me on a run**: Cute boyfriends
A kid came up to me randomly once and yelled out, "HA!  Ryan Seacrest!!!"  I am, in fact, NOT Ryan Seacrest.  I've never felt more horrible about my existence then at that point
Obama sold that broken window theory quite well...  * From [his speech on foreclosures](http://www.huffingtonpost.com/2009/02/18/obama-foreclosure-speech_n_167889.html), February 18, 2009:  &gt;"They see their own homes - their largest single assets - plummeting in value. One study in Chicago found that a foreclosed home reduces the price of nearby homes by as much as 9 percent."  Wait, but what if I'm one of the responsible home buyers who put down a large down payment, bought within their means, and didn't overextend themselves financially?  &gt;"Even if your neighborhood hasn't been hit by foreclosures, you're likely feeling the effects of the crisis in other ways. Companies in your community that depend on the housing market - construction companies and home furnishing stores, painters and landscapers - they're cutting back and laying people off."  We're not running out of places for people to live. These industries are wasteful, consume tons of resources, or are simply unnecessary for the middle class (see:landscaping).  &gt;"The effects of this crisis have also reverberated across the financial markets. When the housing market collapsed, so did the availability of credit on which our economy depends...In the end, all of us are paying a price for this home mortgage crisis. And all of us will pay an even steeper price if we allow this crisis to deepen - a crisis which is unraveling homeownership, the middle class, and the American Dream itself."  So, we need to re-inflate the bubble? The middle class, American lifestyle **is** unsustainable. The suburbs are a disaster from an environmental and transit perspective -- home prices have not kept up with incomes, and people are spending larger and larger amounts of their paychecks on mortgage payments...could that be a cause of the shrinking middle class?  &gt;"And we are not just helping homeowners at risk of falling over the edge, we are preventing their neighbors from being pulled over that edge too - as defaults and foreclosures contribute to sinking home values, failing local businesses, and lost jobs."  More scare tactics...nicely done. If you didn't plan your financial life for a few bumps and weren't responsible with your money (renting or buying within your means) I have little sympathy for you. Blaming the lender (see:salesman) is a cop-out on your responsibility as an adult to manage your finances and understanding contractual obligations.   &gt;"And by bringing down the foreclosure rate, it will help to shore up housing prices for everyone. "  Wait, **what the fuck!?!?!?!?** Homes *are* overpriced, "Shore up" is code for re-inflate -- Obama has stated that putting off the inevitable will only lead to further disaster in the future, but I guess this is one exception for him...  &gt;"Our housing crisis was born of eroding home values, but also of the erosion of our common values."  My grandfather supported five children, his wife, and made mortgage payments all on blue-collar, relatively low-wage factory job, and someone working that same job today could hardly afford to find a descent apartment in the same area. The middle class has been shrinking because wages have not kept up with the cost of goods and living.  &gt;"then I am confident we will overcome this crisis and once again secure that dream for ourselves and for generations to come."  Americans working harder, longer hours with less benefits than their parents...taking an average of [13 days of vacation, lowest in the industrialized world](http://blogs.harvardbusiness.org/baldoni/2009/08/why_you_need_a_vacation.html)...all so corporations can get rich selling us shit from China and other exploitable foreign markets. If that's what the American dream is, then fuck it.   edit: coherence 
Thoroughly debunked. The douche who did the study took several foods *containing* HFCS and tested them for mercury, and several of the foods tested positive for mercury, but nearly all foods test positive for mercury anyway, because mercury is naturally everywhere. If he was smart, like any similar type of scientific study, he would've at least had a control in his test, but he didn't. Also, the dumbass could have simply purchased a bottle of Karo syrup and tested that, instead of testing a number of foods that *contained* HFCS.   It's hard to believe that shit made it to the MSM let alone still circulates many months after it was debunked.
...and why would man tag on a tree?
Hey moron, have you actually thought your plan through?  What happens to the city's tax base when all these home prices come crumbling down?  Who's going to pay for the the cops, teachers....  Think before you speak.  
Great, have fun doing that.
I was recently introduced to American Honey, and I loved it.
Does anybody here remember Vera Lynn?
Be fair to him, he has to operate his bark laptop by handcrank and sun, he can't spend all day typing out well-planned comments. 
My mom just reminds me that she knows she's a bitch :(
A swallow laden with two coconuts.
Check the [gallery archive](http://www.kimberleecline.com/portfolio/gallery-archive/) for what appears to be older, amateur shots. That don't appear shopped.
About as much as [Neo's passport in the Matrix](http://www.cremationofcare.com/latest_headlines_18082008.htm) was chance.
Depends on the baking.  Bread is a lot less picky about exact proportions than cakes.  Bread you can more or less guess at the proportions of your ingredients and still get a good final product.
I think this list may be slightly incomplete.
Anyone else being redirected to a lottery site?
Thanks for the downvote. Because this **definitely** isn't minimalist, or pop. *sheesh*
Fake a medical emergency, to postpone the penalty, threaten to sue them if necessary. Loansharks: quick easy fix, but it is like drugs, if you know you can't handle them, don't even try once. "Donate" plasma for money. Ask any of your acquaintances if they have any work, tell them you will be very cheap but you need the money up front. Rent you asshole out on Craigslist, especially if you are in California you can get good deals, maybe even a career in porn. 
You have to post pics, man.
or this   http://www.7dnews.com/7dnews/uploads/2009/06/stock-market.jpg
Why didnt the u.s. government plant WMD at the end of the war?
` `
Ugh I cannot eat from that place. I try not to eat fastfood fried chicken. The only ones that I go to, that are fastfood, is Popeyes or Frenchies.
Before you start throwing QED and god around together, you probably should understand more of what you're talking about.  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Delayed_choice_quantum_eraser
You should re-submit that over in [the baking sub-reddit.](http://www.reddit.com/r/Baking/)
That dog is a few degrees from my [bun!](http://www.edpadgett.com/blog/uploaded_images/cafe-hot-dog-735531.jpg)
Well, my point was that some imports are clearly better quality but some domestics approach their quality and can be better values price-wise.   While Camry used to be tops in it's category, their quality has slipped while their prices have remained high and they come with fewer standard features. For the cost of a stripped down Camry you can get a better equipped Fusion/Malibu of comparable quality.  A quick review of Edmunds shows this;  Model, Base, Ed. Rating,  User Rating  Accord, $20K,     8.0,      8.3  Altima, $20K,    7.8,       9.0  Camry, $20K,     8.0,       8.6  Fusion, $19K,    7.8,       8.7  Malibu, $21K,    7.5 ,     9.0  Keep in mind those are base prices. Import prices tend to be fixed, where domestics usually have bigger discounts off of sticker.  http://www.hybridcars.com/news2/toyota-reliability-slips-hybrid-shines.html  http://money.cnn.com/2007/10/16/autos/cr_reliability/index.htm
In the beginning it blew, how quickly people forget...
I live in Lisbon, so no go for me.
Why do "they all sound stupid"?  I don't get it.  Also, what would you name such a group, non-stupidly?
&gt;hope that helps!  It's mostly stuff I already know, but the bit about making sure it's edited is something I hadn't considered before, but makes total sense now that you've said it.  Are there certain terrible cliches that we want to avoid when we send our package in? I'm talking things like how we present ourselves via photos, bios, etc, things that might make someone more inclined to dismiss us without giving us a fair shake? I definitely understand what you mean about them being inundated with lots of music and having to wade through lots of shit to get to something they'd actually want to play on the radio. I suppose my primary concern is there being some aspect of our package that makes them go, "Oh, another one of THESE bands" and toss our stuff in the garbage without even listening to it (which I'm sure happens to lots of stuff). Are there any specific pratfalls along those lines I should watch out for?
George W. Bush supposedly believed that Iraq was seeking and developing WMD's ... then all of a sudden when the shit hit the fan he was hiding - in Crawford? Dallas, now.  Not quite the leader you thought he was, huh.  I would say he acted like a thief and a fiend. He will not be missed.  What a shame because his dad was a respected CIA director. George W. Bush brought shame to the family name.
A few months ago my hard drive crashed and I couldn't get Windows to install and I had an old Ubuntu disk laying around. I've been using Linux ever since.
I never go there mostly because of the latter.  Although the site seems to be a crazy mish-mash of buttons and tables as well.
I would kick that fat bitch out of my house
Take an antihistamine or two. As a cold remedy they have the side effect of making you sleepy. As a sleeping pill they have the side effect of drying you out a bit.I buy the generic brand at the drugstore.
Computes perfectly . As long as they're not being assholes to *you*, assholes are frequently great fun to be around.
There isn't any dilemma. Someone's liberty eventually oppresses the liberty, wealth, health, happiness, etc. of other people. From a human's distorted perspective, the planet is vast with unlimited resources. From the planet's perspective, 7 billion humans is getting to be a burden.
Make it so.
It sounds like the premise for the next Resident Evil scenario.
For ginger and cinnamon, I'd probably cook them in the creme/sugar/etc.  Once cooked, put in a bowl in the fridge for at least 4 hours (better overnight) before sticking in the ice cream maker.  I've never done that before, but it seems to me that would be better in that case.
&gt;If you have a problem with the way the USD is managed, you're more than welcome to start using Canadian Dollars, Mexican Pesos, gold coins or sand dollars.  Ever hear of Legal Tender laws?
I don't.  Real, lethal violence, even what I inflicted today on dead pig parts, is disturbing.  Even my friend who helped me (he's a cop, so he did the shooting) was bothered by it.  I'm enjoying the project (which is far from over), but I was kinda creeped out by what I did today.  Still fascinated though.
I know you don't want to use weights, but consider this ( http://www.russiankettlebells.com/ ) it's seriously the best short workout you can do. 
[We are not alone.](http://gadgets.boingboing.net/2008/02/06/ruhlman-defends-the.html)
I guess it's possible.  My experience, of course, may not be typical.  I was just floored by the difference between HS and college.  And very refreshingly so.  I LOVED the fact that damn near everyone was there to learn AND party at the same time.  The ones who were there only to party didn't last more than a year.
couldnt agree more
I would say straight human females are hardwired to find examples of virility.  In today's society a fat wallet is one example of male virility.   However there are plenty of other examples of manliness-- think of all the types of male strippers.  No business men in the pack -- it's all firemen, policemen, lumberjack, and what appears to be the fast growing equivalent to the hot librarian -- the shy, hot IT guy.  
"all men are created equal" means that all should be provided equal opportunities. It does not meant hat a short and a tall man are of equal height, nor that a smart and a dumb man are of equal intelligence.
I wonder what the most upvoted comment in reddit history is...
The Gnostics called that 'god' Yhodebaoloth (sp), he is not the creator, but thinks he is. He's the old-testament jerk god.
Stumped it with Yuka from Elfen Lied.
No, I do not accept Lynds *hypothesis*. And I find it to be an amateurish effort at publication. Wired's presentation of the story of Lynds hypothesis is of no concern to me. It's editorialization.   I did read his papers on this and Zeno's paradox. Both equally amateurish. This does not disprove them or cause me to declare them incorrect. I simply will not know if he is on to something ( he certainly isn't there yet ) or not until they are verified experimentally or disproven.  That's just how I roll.
You just gave him business
I used to draw it [with only 2 vertical lines in the whole thing.](http://imgur.com/g0How.png) It looks better on paper by hand but that is how I used to do it. I do remember Stussy, but I don't remember actually seeing this symbol on anything of theirs.
Seems appropriate, the site for those who worked with List Processor (LISP) now has a list of links. I hope the webserver is running on Lisp.
Yes.  I went out with an English girl on saturday.  Most of the time, I had no idea what she said, I would ask, "What?" and "Huh?"  Then I would just smile and nod after the third time.  
never gets old
While I have plans of one day making fancier things with my ice cream maker, I find that most of the time I opt for the easy route of tossing in some yogurt and letting that freeze up into a delicious frogurt.  Some ice cream makers are good for slushies too, just pour in whatever juice you have on hand and you're on your way!
I wish they'd publish a complete collection of his works.  Tracking down all of his more obscure or out of print stuff is difficult.
She'll have her costume on in a few *minutes*?  That's far too long!  All Batman and Robin have to do is slide down a long, hard pole and they're ready for action.
12 year Macallan.
I want to meet and date #2
If the dollar declines in value, the price of things we import like oil will go up.
No, seriously dude. Can you post a link so we can check it out?
so what, the use of the word was correct.
and also because it is in The God Delusion. Great quote though, great thinking.
Download Linux Mint. Run the live CD. If you like it, install it and say goodbye to all the half-assed windows bs that will soon make you wonder how you tolerated it for so long.  Seriously. This is what I did about 2 years ago, and it was liberating.
Ok, two things:  1) Where is my sexiest Batman? and  2) This was from a dream story in which Batman married Kathy Kane. Had never heard of this before now. [Story behind this comic](http://www.lonelygods.com/w/bat2.html) (4 paragraphs in)
Yeah. Why study anything when it is far easier to go with simple assumptions that give you the story you want to hear.   "Hoover was laissez faire capitalist; depression happened; FDR came in and fixed the country using socialism" is the story most people believe because that's what they have been told.
This is a plate of balls with rich lashings of cock sauce.  Welcome to Suckville, Spidey. Population: You.
you're quite nerdy for running around with an IR thermometer checking the temperatures of cars.
**Pre-existing conditions are not for life** This was news to me. I am for health care reform and the public option, but this is how I understand them to work.  If you have insurance continuously for 2 years or so and agree that during those 2 years that everything related to diabetes is not covered, then after that time, it will be covered from then on as long as you don't loose your insurance for more than 6 months strait.  So financially it's a pretty big hit for something like Diabetes, and terrible for major surgery, but if you can manage to stay insured continuously, you will have your test strips, blood checkers and endocrinologist visits covered up to whatever percent your plan pays. Well, after you meet your deductible.  Lets say you have a deductible of $2000. You pay 100% of all your healthcare until you meet that deductible. Then your insurance company pays the bulk of the costs from there, but not all. Each year it resets and you have to meet that deductible again for insurance to pay a part.  Damn, Canada's public plan looks pretty good right about now.
I was working part time for this really small computer retailer and this idiot claims that his computer will not turn on. Turns out he didn't connect the I/O button to his circuit board correctly. 
Lol he is saying that if you have an abortion because your baby will be born all fucked up that somehow you are a little Hitler.
Yeah, I came into this thread to post that. If I wasn't planning on cremation for myself and if I thought it mattered, I'd want a variation of that on my headstone.
depends on how much caffeine i've consumed...
&gt; It's impossible to have the information you are suggesting   So, God can never tell you what you'll do?
This is a difficult one.  I'm sure no harm was intended.  Some people just aren't tactful.  At the same time, maybe some people aren't aware of what dentists can do.  In that sense, this information could have been a net win for you.  Regardless of how noble and honest a life you live, you will be presented with my extremely awkward [and painful] situations.
That's not the only thing he's violated... :)
Because tanning is important to absolutely no one
Probably just didn't want you messing around with his videos.
If you treat people differently based on how attractive you find them, you're "attractionist", but not racist because the basis of your discrimination is attraction, not race. If attraction is correlated with race, bad luck, but it's not his intent to discriminate based on race so no, it's not racism.
Robbing Peter (Federal Reserve) to pay Paul (US Govt.) does not a strategy make.  It's closer to an unpleasant exam by an unlicensed proctologist, and the appointment never ends.
Do some google searches to see if it has issues with Vista, 7 and Vista are very similar so fixes should work for either. Or try out compat mode.
Kablahblah
cuteness is cuteness
I was actually insinuating that it was you who told her to kiss her elbow.  Anyway, it's a sweet little story, have an upvote.
Holy shiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiit. Valve has got to pull the craziest shit to top this. I mean, the end? Oh fuuuuck!!!! Did not expect that! Brilliant, absolutely brilliant! Upvote for you for linking this, and an applause to the creator of this video. 
That is because it isn't and they are and do.
BRA FUCKING VO!!!!
He's like Walter Sobchak.  He's an asshole and a dumbass but he's a good guy to have on your side.
As a UK citizen, this makes me quite angry.
Ah, yes I remember, it *was* the gcc Ada compiler option. Thanks for clarifying
&gt;I think what it does, it shows South Africa from white eyes — the fear that the African is a cannibal who wants to eat others to assimilate their power,"  I guess the person making this quote forgot about the other African characters in the film. What he's talking about was portrayed in a small part of the slum in the movie. It's too bad if that's how Africans think white people feel about them. Maybe he saw the movie with his "black eyes." 
Im a girl and I do that too! I think its a security thing. It feels nice.
I made the 'Cooked bacon close-up' by background. Just. Beautiful.
We hereby present  **grampajoe**  with a Nobel Prize for  *solving world hunger*
Bad news-- that wasn't funny at all.
Republicans cloak their "we hate poor people" in a bunch of rhetoric about "welfare queens" and "self reliance".  Comparatively, they're extremely upfront about their hatred of gays.
That's a nice comeback that I haven't seen plastered on the internet like some drunk girl's facebook link.
why not ctl + ?
I know how you feel, I'm mortified someone from work would recognize me somehow and be idiot enough to say something. ugh.  I think your pics are nice by the way, I'm not into girls, but they're still nice :) If ppl want to be that picky, screw 'em...or well don't.
&gt; People in South America aren't all redneck hicks.  at first i was all like "wait, what?!". then i realised you meant the southern united states. people in **south america** are all macho jerks who overthrow their governments between bullfights.
Win.
nope, not today.
The question you need to ask is what is right with them?
It's the study of skeletonized human remains in a medicolegal context.  In layman's terms: we look at bones to determine who they belonged to and how they died.
I understand there's something about delicious cake.  
I have medal no. 6615, but it's showing my steam ID instead of my name.   Synapse [Reddit]
Do not let him do that!  I had a kitten that died that way. She kept climbing into the couch, so we sealed off the bottom with a tarp and duct tape (this was in college) but she got into it while we were away in class, and got tangled in some loose string that was up inside the couch. Dead kitten.  Be careful. Also, sorry to be a buzzkill, drunks.  tl;dr: Kitten inside back of couch = dead kitten. Avoid.
the jerk store called...
In the west you can find places where soldiers and settlers massacred and raped Indians.  It's sort of the same thing.
There is no proof that the cigarette-smoking man was a socialist.
I might have mentioned that I rarely finish anything. As someone who flits around a lot, it honestly never crossed my mind that you'd finished all these games. Which I know is a little silly, because most people do just that.  Ever since SubSpace I've rarely bought a game for anything but the multiplayer, and I never tire of those entirely. I still play Quake II occasionally, reinstall UT2K4 at least once or twice a year, still subscribe to Anarchy Online even, but now that you bring it up I don't think I've ever been all the way through a single player game twice. God help me, I got bored halfway through Chrono Trigger a few months ago.
It's not racist, just means you like people of a particular race, it's just like if someone prefers blondes over other hair colors.
I didn't want to get into this. I might delete this comment later. I can't get a non-large one on, even past the tip. The thing is, when I started using condoms in the late 90s I don't recall having that problem with "normal" condoms. And when I bought a "large" condom, it was noticeably larger. I don't recall there being this many "large" brands 10 years ago, though. In fact I had to search pretty hard to find the two or three "large" brands (and the "large" was in small print, usually) at the drug store. "Large" condoms I can get on with some effort, but can't feel anything. The Durex XXL is the best thing for me so far. Still quite snug, but not unbearable. Having said that, I'm exclusive with one woman now and she's been tested and is on the pill, so I won't have to worry about it for a while.
Yeah, but you don't see the difference in the level of doucheness there? Not to mention seriousness.  It like if someone said, "Tell your mom I had a great time last night."  And the other person responded with, "Well, at least my mom isn't going to die because she doesn't have cancer like your mom."
Would you suggest this to others, I was thinking of trying this over the summer.
I'd watch track and field all day if this was the event.
i do this all the time.  Sometimes I throw in a second "what?" after they repeat themselves partly to justify the first and partly hoping that they will give up.
**How To Good-Bye Depression: If You Constrict Anus 100 Times Everyday. Malarkey? Or Effective Way?**   *By Some Japanese Guy*
oh god, looks like an alien hamster .... please don't probe my anus
this is sort of the compromise i had with my parents (my mom actually, dad didn't care). I put a simple hook latch on the door and my mother could open the door wide enough and slide a piece of card board or whatever to unlatch it.  Sadly, i think it was unlatched way too often - certainly never for an emergency. Needless to say, i found other ways of ensuring the door remained closed. IMHO a 14-15 year old should be entitled to some measure of privacy and control of their own bedroom.
thou shalt not dub a fag Knight.
Really nice, better than most of the crap on the radio nowadays. I listened to all your songs and I'm really digging them.
Yes they would need large socks.
Yep, me too.  I hate having to flush the toilet and walk back to my bed with the lights off - I always think that whatever is lurking down the hallway would obviously use the sound of the toilet as cover, so I wouldn't hear it's footsteps and would follow me and bite my feet as I walked.  Often I run and jump the last few feet to my bed.  
OMG! How can you not like blue cars!?!??!?!?!
Hmm... Was he head of security? I thought he was more of a private detective. I guess I missed that part. If he was, then that *would* make sense. But still, you would think Hitler would have been more aware of the seeming sudden lack of security that I am sure he was used to normally getting.
In Las Vegas, Phoenix, and most of southern California, prices are down 60+% from the peak and it looks like they're as cheap as they're going to get.  Buying activity is way up in the last few months.  Prices haven't moved up yet, but they've been stable for several months and the listing of houses for sale in my neighborhood has dropped from 20 pages to 4.
That's the flaw in the  western dogma of original sin. [Saint John Cassian](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/John_Cassian) wrote some great things on this subject.
well, 1/0 = \infinity on the extended complex plane, which is actually more like a sphere...
My girlfriend and I stayed together last year while 1000 miles apart.  I was off at school for the year and only saw her three times.  We are still together and going strong.  A)   I think we've managed to stay together this long because we're still as madly in love with each other as the day we started dating. B)   We're both fiercely monogamous, and couldn't imagine being with anyone else. We've both seen enough other people to know what we want in a relationship.  C)   We dated briefly a few years ago, stayed close friends, and have now been dating for a year and a half.
Quite strange but ultimately brilliant song about Marlon Brando....it starts out normal enough and then about 2 mins in it starts to change radically..  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=GF8ZAuM9DiE
The article says in Mexico it's not a crime to have up to 5 grams of marijuana...."enough for four joints."  Whoever wrote this is rolling some fatty doobs.
"Were you dreaming about eating potato chips from the sky?" comment from FML
The only reason you feel forced to use the USD is because **you actually are [forced to use the USD](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Legal_tender#In_the_United_States).**  If someone offers you payment with Federal Reserve notes to discharge debt... that debt is legally discharged.
adultsheepfinder.com if thats your thing
Most of the public voted for Obamas character and smarts, and his ability to judge critically, with an independent mind. So why all the hoopla over his decision to continue with both wars, once having entered office and the relevant facts were presented to him?
It's funny 'cause it's true
Only in America could the Democrats be considered "left" much less *hard* left. 
Still I guess they had fun.
Finally, some one is teaching students how the real world works.
To get it one would have to drive to PA.  I look forward to every out of state adventure I make, because I'm bound to get some Yuengling.
Agreed, and the Genius feature is actually pretty good, I use it all the time.
I agree, I never do it in directional lots. But on a Monday afternoon at IKEA I figure no one is going to be racing to parking spots when there were plenty open...
Exactly - We are here only because it is possible to be here. That's it!  So, as you say, enjoy the trip with out doing harm and I'd add; try to do something for the rest of humanity whilst you're at it.   Just as we stand on the shoulders of gaints - let's give the next generation a boost up the ladder. 
your comment reminded me of a con man my dad knew. he walked around looking for investors for a resort he was building in arizona. He had brochures and blue prints made up and everything. Partied pretty hard too for a 65 year old man.
Gotta love those inflatable light-saber dildos.
[Here](http://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/comments/8l3zi/so_many_of_our_grandparents_were_racist_and_some)'s a very similar discussion from reddit.
I HAVE TO WATCH A FUCKING VIDEO AD FOR AIR WICK BEFORE I CAN PLAY A GODDAMNED REMAKE OF A DOS GAME WHAT THE FUCK WHO DO THEY THINK IS BUYING THIS SHIT ARGH ASPGIENGPEGINEGW INTERESTING NOTE THERE WAS NOT A SINGLE MALE IN THE ENTIRE COMMERCIAL
Again?
But most guys learn to go with whatever is available.
Black Sheep. Good film.
At least 1 billion dollars.
It always gets me how happy the guy looks on that photo. He's having the time of his life!
Playing ultimate frisbee in an intramurals game against stereotypical frat guys who didn't much appreciate being called on the rules (no setting picks, no travelling, no grabbing, etc...)  **Me**: Travel.  **Douchiest Frat Guy**: Can't you play the game without being such a pussy?  **Me**: Can't you get laid without raping someone?   Luckily somebody got in between him and **me** at that point, or I would probably have got my ass kicked, typical d-bag that he was, all he could think to do after getting burned was to fight.
I know it's not quite the same as Master of Orion, but Space Rangers 2 is similar and very fun. If you're a fan of MOO2 and haven't tried Space Rangers 2, I recommend it.
Upvoted for bluntly saying what I was thinking. I hope other people do the same.
TITS OR GTFO MY /R/
You mean bald, middle-aged cyclist that rides through the forest with an erection? Yeah, every city in the Pacific Northwest has one.
I'm a tech who works on Windows machines and networks for small businesses and home users. About two years ago it occurred to me that I was not a computer tech but merely a Windows tech. I didn't want to limit myself to Windows and I was eager for something new after about 5 years in the business.   Although I personally never had a problem with viruses and spyware and I could run a Windows machine reliably, I have come to greatly appreciate Linux for it's reliability and freedoms.  Now I use it on my server and personal machine and could never go back to Windows. I feel sorry for my poor customers who constantly fight Windows issues and I would like to start using my Linux knowledge professionally but my customers look at me like I'm crazy when I mention Linux.
I can see the breathing holes for chewbacca in his tongue
did you locate him?
I don't understand it.  James Coco went mad in fifteen minutes!
That looks like a useful app, but it's ugly.   Honestly I think one of my greatest faults is my value of form over function. I couldn't use anything that looked like that, I don't know why.
lol, people love digital cameras, people love throw away cameras, let's make a throw away digital camera!  Who gave these guys money?
Nothing in that article stated that HMOs had to be non profit.  Nothing.  The only thing stated in that article was that only **NON-PROFIT** HMOs were given federal grant money to keep going...which is sounding eerily like the co-op plans that are being developed right now (history repeating itself again).  Nothing.  Another thing the article talks about, and this is **MOST** important to the healthcare debate, is about when Reagan took over.  The government did *another* intervention into the market that helped out a small sector of health insurance (for profit), that again, no one asked for (and, with a Democratic Majority in power none-the-less).   A Democratic House, and a Democratic Senate. No wonder the Contract with America bullshit of the early 90s worked so fucking well to create a republican majority.  Oh, and the provisions to deny care are actually part of the HMO act of 1973. To bad that provision was left *WAY* wide open to interpretation with the provision still there when the government intervened again in a market that should not have existed...again!  So, going back to administration change: Who is to say that today, for example, we get a Public option, but then, if Palin/Romney 2016 get elected, they change it so that those on the public option can also be denied care due to having to control cost due to some (most likely made up) war with Iran or N. Korea, or Sweden?   We do have way too many *multiple* instances of administrations changing shit that is working, and fucking it up for everyone.   This, and the fact that for the last 20 years, our government, although it has done *some* good things, have proven themselves to be unthinking,  mouth breathing, dumbshit warmongers, is why I am so against a Government option that it is not even funny.  Finally, how the fuck are we going to pay for it, especially since our dear leader has pledged to not want to raise taxes on anyone less than $150K?  NOTE: Oh, by the way, the HMO act of 1973 was created to curb the outrageously expensive program that no one thought would cost so much at the time: Medicare.
Minerva: Metastasis  It's a HL2 mod that was so good they hired the guy to make maps for Episode 3.
There's always Cafepress.  Pricey though.
Stupid question, Why not? If his upload speed is good enough and they live close enough together then ping and bandwidth shouldn't be an issue.
Upvoted for kings. 
1. That's a shocking number of murders.  2. Maybe I'm reading the graph wrong, but it does look like a downward trend since about the end of 2003.  It would be more informative to have a murder per capita graph than the total number of murders. The population of London is growing, no?
No, the guy in the wheelchair's comment was just guys joking around.  He wasn't even trying to be insulting, just poking fun at us.  Then my cousin's comeback was basically a verbal shotgun blast in the face.
this sometimes isn't necessary, but masturbating right before sleeping generally helps
I think it's a smiley face but on it's side.
I've been known to fit it into the middle of sentences ("Have you completed the report re: the color of the Reddit envelope?"), much to the confusion of people who really ought to know better.
R2D2 as trash can?  BRILLIANT!!!
lol you can pay for it.   You see, goods and services, in a free market....
It also may be that the investigator is a vector for some sort of bee disease.  That would have been easy to control for though using unpowered cell phones.
how is what I said ridiculous?
I published a short story and a poem, both in print-only format. I also was given a small grant for poetry. Oddly enough, my primary expression is painting.  
http://www.pixhost.org/thumbs/272/583570_leahaaronhor_big_img3.jpg &lt;-- NSFW!
Oh we all want a chance to be someone else at some point.
The drunkard who loves to touch your cock.
I link to it, but made it easier to download.  one of his commenters even referenced having a PDF.  I just obliged.
Likely a /b/tard, probably hacked someones account
Probably not in that order.
It's the old Stussy "s"
marvel jumped the shark about 15-20 years ago. all the movies are just going back to the classic material.
I think it's hard to believe, but not necessarily funny, that a school would be teaching Ada as their introductory programming language.  I'm not aware of anyone else who does this.  Also, your claim that pointer education doesn't happen in 'java schools' is patently false.  UT's intro courses are java, but upper division courses get into functional programming and programming with pointers.  From what I've seen, this is typical with schools that do Java.
Well, I wouldn't date a woman who tans, but that's just because I don't dig skin cancer.  :-) The melanin content of someone's skin has absolutely nothing to do with what sort of person they are.
men's shoulders -- **sigh**
Nicely done, sir.
This is sadly true by today's cancerous politically correctness.
you, sir, are my hero.
one a week, gives everyone a chance to join in. 
Have you ever been to the DMV?   M-F 9-4pm.  Take a number and sit down if there is a seat left.  I'd like to say that the main factor increasing the cost of healthcare artificially is labor shortage.  Obviously there are also non-artificial cost increases in the form of research, and investing in measures which preclude errors and legal liabilities.  Biology and ideology usually intersect messily.  People should always be able to seek out the less elaborate option provided they are responsible for the choices they make.  Want to be exposed to the risks of unscreened Factor VIII if you are a hemophiliac, well that's your preference.  But you shouldn't get to sue anyone.  On the one hand we need to eliminate barriers to entry in the medical field.  On the other, we need to punish any industry that is making our anti-microbial weapons useless prematurely. Ultimately, we have to take more power away from corporations, government and let it be shared between patient and doctor.  Along with that power, we have to attribute responsibility though.  It's not reasonable to keep laying all these overhead concerns on entrepreneurs, especially those not specialized in medical fields.  The guy that knows how to manage an office, find customers, and construct buildings doesn't need to be burdened with the knowledge of cobra policies or how to skirt million dollar leukemia surcharges.  Ideally, individuals should not be stuck with individual policies either.  There is much to be said about the role of collective bargaining within liberal systems.  All parties are free to refuse of course.  Any number of associations should be able to spring up to answer the needs of its members.  Those members should have final say over who is admitted under their umbrella of shared protections via their group policies.  These could be state plans, municipal plans, neighborhood plans, interest group plans, or even knitting circle plans.  Basically any affinity group stands a better chance of taking an active interest in the welfare of their members.
True, it is a Unitarian church... but pretty sweet speech none the less.
i love when he feels all over my body when we have sex. i like to give him whatever he wants ;)
I often used to harass the girl that sat next to me in Psychology lessons a few years ago, and she'd occasionally try and enact revenge. During one lesson she repeatedly tried to attack me with some tippex (correction fluid).   **Me:** What are you doing!   **Her:** Erasing a mistake!
alrighty then....
Adrian Belew is not human
The trick Is to capitalize Random Words.
Be careful, this may get you in to more trouble than it's worth, after all you're outnumbered if you're in the minority.  Use the police, walk away, promote education, I think those maybe better avenues for your anger.
Props. My first thought was "it's OK if you're a puppetmaster who's not in the executive or the legislative branch..."
I just caught myself letting the "Read It Later extension" tab open for reading it later.
I would think that the higher statistical moments (skewness, kurtosis) and the standard error would reveal the differences in these data sets. Also collinearity would reveal how linear the data sets are - and I believe the collinearity would be different for each of these.
I use Windows 7 as my main OS, purely for the sake of being the cockblocker in circlejerks like this one. Seriously though, use Linux for yourself and you'll find out why it's, in quite a few aspects, better than Windows or Mac (although I won't say it's better overall... yet).
Wear black shirts.
It's fucking Albatross flavour
Livin' up to your name there pal! ;-)
Sounds like he was offended that you took "his" spot.  People can be lame like that.  When I read "pull forward", my initial thought was left turn situations.  I get very annoyed when the person ahead of me in the left turn lane just sits behind the crosswalk waiting for an opening, because when the light turns red there's no time for me to make the left without running it.  Think about this next time you encounter an overflowing left turn lane.  Few people seem to get the concept of pulling forward to the center of the intersection and waiting there, so that two or three people behind them can get into position too.  This is/was the method described to me by the New York State Driver's Manual, and it really does cut down on congestion.
Pun using word from downvoted attempt that gets upvoted unreasonably.
Now I am not following you :), You are basically saying that society is not *just*, that is a different matter entirely. Striving for *everybody* to be happy is a lofty goal, but not a requirement for overall stability. Please correct me if I'm wrong, but the examples you mentioned are, sadly, part of any society I know off.  Are you advocating anarchy?, I'm not sure that 'the rule of the mob' is the way to go forward. And to be really really cynical, I don't believe there is such a thing as free will, like it or not, it is always formed by others (school, friends, religious leaders, newspapers, midnight comedians, scientific community , Fox News etc..). Nobody has the time, nor the necessary education to sift to all the evidence, and therefore we need to rely on before mentioned opinion makers., each with their own agenda. Does this make us sheeple? Perhaps,  but I am open to alternatives 
Thousands?
OK, first you, sir, are a moron. The reason you are such a massive moron is that you obviously have no understanding of property taxes.  They have absolutely no relationship to the actual value of houses.  They are based on the relative value of houses.  The taxing authority sets a tax amount and then allocates the cost to each property based in its relative value.  Therefore, the actual value of property will have no relationship to the "city's tax base."  The city is getting it's money regardless of the value of housing.  Its just a question of how the tax base is allocated. Moron!  EDIT:  In fact, just to educate you a bit.  For the reasons discussed above, the property tax is actually one of the most stable forms of taxation.  In contrast, the income tax fluctuates wildly with the rate of unemployment.  Property taxes are collected regardless.  If a home goes into foreclosure, the bank must pay the property tax.  If the owner stays, they must pay the property tax.  If neither pays, then the city puts a lien on the property.  
Now I have to know who Diderot is. He sounds like my friend James.
Besides in that situation, that means that somebody else found the CP on the person's computer, and then went back and said... 'gee, who worked on this computer in the last 5 years, let's prosecute the repair guy too!'
She was referring to her Elvis costume.
Every time I have a debate with that douchebag (DavidCOG), the same annoying pattern follows. All my comments go down by 2, so the ass has at least 2 accounts.  I've learned my lesson, and will no longer feed the troll. My face can't take that many facepalms.
Covenent dropship inbound!
No, [this](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=D0yuqpk00Ts) is the most existential film scene ever.
A fellow reporter was doing a live update on TV when in some crazy brainstorm he forgot the name of a senior Government minister, lost his train of thoughts and floundered his way to a sort of spluttering halt. When he came back into the newsroom one of my colleagues called accross to him; "Never mind, Robin. It's live TV. We've all *nearly* done that"
They do look quite poor at that size - I can see why people would rather use GHz (easier too).
Florida law requiring civilians to stand is really not the same thing as school policy. I never stood for the pledge in high school on principle and after 4 years of doing so a substitute teacher told me that my friend and I both I had to to leave the classroom immediately for disciplinary action instead of staying to take an AP calculus exam. Several students tried to stand up and say that's ridiculous and I just said everyone calm down, I'll go talk to the assistant principle and they will just send me back. Once I was down there the first thing they said was that it was the law, and I said I was well aware it wasn't, and that it in fact had been upheld by the SCOTUS that students that were opposed to the idolation didn't have to stand for the pledge. They immediately told me that it didn't matter, that it was a school rule and I took out the rule book and said I had read it and they should show me where in the rule book it was (the rule book they give out to students lacks any punishments or classification/grouping of the rules to indicate what rules result in more harsh punishments. There was a rumor that there was an actual rule book that the assistant principles were supposed to roughly follow but I had never seen it.) They said that it doesn't have to be in the rule book to be a rule, and that if I wanted to challenge it they could give me in school suspension and I could leave to find a lawyer right away.   I just let it go since it obviously wouldn't be worth it in my last 6 months of high school and the regular teacher just let me take the exam the next day, and I continued to sit during the pledge for the rest of the year.  I know the story isn't all that interesting, it just shows how what is legal to be mandatory isn't the same thing as what is mandatory in school.
Or the Americans.
You're right, it's not in his DC office.
There was only one community college in my city, so my choice was pretty easy.  This was back when classes cost $11 a unit.  
Yes. 
Meh, I suppose. They've had it easy so far, and this is really just Manager Of The Half-Month. Spurs' next 2 games will be Harry's real test. If they come through those two with a couple of wins, then that would be very impressive.
Lock and load. Yeah, I'm there.
I'm less worried about this than I normally would be for a very simple reason:  people will find a way around it.  The internet was designed to survive devastating outages in parts of the network and still route around it and survive. We, the hackers who built the thing to begin with, will make it work no matter what.  Fuck whatever President who thinks he can take the power of information from the people.
I'm hearing Don McLean's *American Pie* but instead its "the day the comics died..."
Yes. Partly because I feel dumb that I can not understand them. Also, I feel bad making them repeat themselves constantly.  If it is at work and I think it might be important, I pretend I understand, and ask them to shoot me an email just as a reminder (actually so I can read what the fuck they are trying to say). 
http://thepiratebay.org/user/albiondean/
id encourage you to learn more abt it, its socialism without the hierarchy !
That's awesome.. I'm doing a timelapse series out of my hi-rise window in Chicago right now.. Not as dramatic though... good stuff! 
fucking sweet. but still. I WANT MY BC, GODAMMIT!!!
Girlfriend and I broke up. She's good friends with my best friend's sister. He and I are in the basement playing video games, Ex-GF and the sister are upstairs.  Their little brother(7yo) comes down and says "EX-GF says you're an asshole." Me: "Did she tell you to come down here say that?"   Little brother: "Yes."   Me: "Then you go tell her she's just *a* hole."  He did.
Man... after reading some of these posts, I really need to get me into the hard disk repair business.
Maybe some women wear makeup to out-stage other women, but I've never seen it that way. I wear make up because it makes me feel happy to be pretty. I actually try to wear less makeup around other women because I don't want them to think I'm trying to outdo them. Hence, I wear the most makeup when I'm home alone.   As for the women are beautiful, men are ugly thing, attractiveness in a woman is all about being young and healthy (i.e. beautiful) so that she can bear healthy children, whereas attractiveness in a man is about being powerful and willing to use that power to help raise kids. Having good genes that will help the offspring also has an effect on attractiveness for both genders. Beauty isn't very relevant to men's attractiveness because beauty is basically a sign saying "my womb works well". 
I saw it. :)
"Difficult" == felonious ?
Upvoted because it reminds me of Kenny from South Park.
thanks, that is perfect.
If it's too cold, just throw on more layers of sheets &amp; comforters. I have a sheet &amp; comforter on if the nighttime low is anything lower than 70°, better than to have to wear clothes 24-7. Flannel sheets are good too, have those on from October to May. 
So can you explain why throughout 2007 and 2008, spot prices were higher than futures prices?
This would never happen if the Democrats were in power!  *crickets*
Where did all this reddit sense come from?  I think I am in love with reddit comments again.
How much creativity does it really take to get around that?  If you loan someone money, you just need a contract stating you are exchanging whatever good or service for a payment in whatever currency you prefer.  As long as you state it up front, you don't have to accept USD.
True, and I enjoy going to fur trading outposts that are pocked among the valley. Really cool to be stepping into a place where history once took place.
Do these people own keyboards?
Thank you. I don't actually use Ubuntu but if I have the oportunity I'll check it on someone who does. Or I might actually compile, that might take a while though.
lol, damn so didn't think of that, kudos to you. 
Wikus is also the bumbling son-in-law of a corporate exec, thats why he gets promoted and put in charge of the census/eviction. So the movie is also about his transformation from pencil pusher to reluctant hero. Possibly he is put in charge to fail, with planned lethal results for the Prawns.  Some might think the movie was a bit harsh on Nigerians with the gangster/warlord types, but [Nigeria](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Nigeria#Early_history) is a country of 148 million people (2007), so has its fair share and spectrum of human types. And one day will be the capital of the African EC. We in the West tend to only see the worst news coming out of Africa, theres a lot there that is simialr and identical to the West, cities and towns and culture etc. We have more in common than different, which is true of all human kind.  Its a good movie, well worth going to see. Not your usual wall to wall action packed fest, the plot and characters  (Human and Prawn) build over the timeline of the movie. The sequel should be interesting.
Sorry to hear you had/are having such a hard time of it :-( Assuming your symptoms are purely physical, you are in a very small minority. I believe (not trying to be an a-hole here) most withdrawal symptoms are psychosomatic and can be reduced by preparing yourself sufficiently before quitting. This is what Carr espouses, basically - its very interesting to read his ideas as they completely against common wisdom, e.g. He is dead against attempting to cut down before giving up. Anyhow, I hope you eventually find a way to get free.
Box of wine.
How long have you boys been going out?
I was going to comment about getting fired and laughing, but it would have been a worth-while cause to get fired for.
JUSTICE IS SERVED.
It definitely occurred to us that they might consider this an invation of their privacy.  We came up with some groundrules early on -- Taking photos with their camera was out. Posting any photos online was out.  Most of my family actually use this story as a *cautionary* tale about privacy, because it illustrates how someone's contact information could be found by assembling seemingly small details.  (What trail are you leaving online?)
You are an idiot.
And are stressed to hell / busting their ass / make a living annoying people and have to constantly worry about their next sale.
He comes across as a power whore. Can't believe I used to support them way back when they came onto the scene [act]. edit: clarification
Weed just doesn't agree with some people. Maybe you're one of them.  I get freaked out/paranoid sometimes when I get really high, but I just remind myself that it's a side-effect of MMJ and that it will soon pass, which it always does.
So there were a bunch of people just kickin' it your room, and some cunt had the nerve to accuse you of stealing beer from your own mini-fridge? That's a damned thing. Slick comeback, have an upvote.  EDIT: Your friend, that is. Pass the upvote on to him.
I don't think Friends worked from its launch in 2003 until some time in 2008.
Neither has anyone in that car with you... but kudos none the less
I always upvote eugenics.  
I have maybe 1 good joke every year. I feel obligated to share it as often as possible.
These reports are overly optimistic to the point of lying. The institutions paying us back are the ones we knew would pay us back. There are still billions in outstanding loans, much of which we may never get back.
Much love Nikki, you're the only pornstar i've ever respected.....anywho since you are so into music, what is the 1 band ever you'd kill to go see?
The main reason the church does that is so that when you die they get to own your possessions.  Religion is just one big scam.  Its a shame people still fall for it.
&gt;Localism is a separate principle than size of government.  And granting shiny new powers to the government because you can't stand for anything to be unregulated makes the government **BIGGER**.  Imagine that.
